Diocletian - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Early life Toggle Early life subsection 
1.1 Death of Numerian 
1.2 Conflict with Carinus 
2 Early rule Toggle Early rule subsection 
2.1 Maximian made Caesar 
2.2 Conflict with Sarmatia and Persia 
2.3 Maximian made Augustus 
3 Tetrarchy Toggle Tetrarchy subsection 
3.1 Foundation of the Tetrarchy 
3.2 Conflict in the Balkans and Egypt 
3.3 War with Persia 

3.3.1 Invasion counterinvasion 

3.3.2 Peace negotiations 
4 Religious persecutions Toggle Religious persecutions subsection 
4.1 Early persecutions 
4.2 Great Persecution 
5 Later life Toggle Later life subsection 
5.1 Illness and abdication 
5.2 Retirement and death 
6 Reforms Toggle Reforms subsection 
6.1 Tetrarchic and ideological 
6.2 Administrative 
6.3 Legal 
6.4 Military 
6.5 Economic 

6.5.1 Taxation 

6.5.2 Currency and inflation 
7 Legacy 
8 Notes 
9 References 
10 Bibliography Toggle Bibliography subsection 
10.1 Ancient sources 
10.2 Modern sources 
11 External links Toggle the table of contents Diocletian 84 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch  Aragons Asturianu Azrbaycanca    Bnlmg   Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Frysk Gaeilge Galego     Hrvatski Bahasa Indonesia slenska Italiano  Jawa  Kiswahili Kurd  Latina Latvieu Ltzebuergesch Lietuvi Magyar  Malagasy    Bahasa Melayu Nederlands  Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha   Polski Portugus Romn    Shqip Sicilianu Simple English Slovenina Slovenina   srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog  Trke   Ting Vit Winaray  Yorb  Zazaki  Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikiquote Wikisource From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Roman emperor from 284 to 305 This article is about the Roman emperor. For other uses see Diocletian disambiguation. Diocletian Laureate head of Diocletian Roman emperor Soloreign Coreign 20 November 284  1 April 286 1 April 286  1 May 305 in the East Predecessor CarinusNote 1 Successor Galerius East Constantius I West Coemperor Maximian in the West Born Diocles 22 December 2422452 Salona Dalmatia Roman Empire Died 3 December 311312 aged c.68 Aspalathos Dalmatia Roman Empire Burial Diocletians Palace Spouse Prisca Issue Valeria Names Gaius Valerius Diocles Gaius Aurelius Valerius Diocletianus Regnal name Imperator Caesar Gaius Aurelius Valerius Diocletianus Augustus Religion Pontifex maximus of the Roman civil cult Diocletian da.klin DYEKLEEshn Latin Gaius Aurelius Valerius Diocletianus Ancient Greek  romanized Diokletians 242245  311312 nicknamed Jovius was Roman emperor from 284 until his abdication in 305. He was born Diocles to a family of low status in the Roman province of Dalmatia. Diocles rose through the ranks of the military early in his career eventually becoming a cavalry commander for the army of Emperor Carus. After the deaths of Carus and his son Numerian on a campaign in Persia Diocles was proclaimed emperor by the troops taking the name Diocletianus. The title was also claimed by Caruss surviving son Carinus but Diocletian defeated him in the Battle of the Margus. Diocletians reign stabilized the empire and ended the Crisis of the Third Century. He appointed fellow officer Maximian as Augustus coemperor in 286. Diocletian reigned in the Eastern Empire and Maximian reigned in the Western Empire. Diocletian delegated further on 1 March 293 appointing Galerius and Constantius as junior colleagues each with the title Caesar under himself and Maximian respectively. Under the Tetrarchy or rule of four each tetrarch would rule over a quarterdivision of the empire. Diocletian secured the empires borders and purged it of all threats to his power. He defeated the Sarmatians and Carpi during several campaigns between 285 and 299 the Alamanni in 288 and usurpers in Egypt between 297 and 298. Galerius aided by Diocletian campaigned successfully against Persia the empires traditional enemy and in 299 he sacked their capital Ctesiphon. Diocletian led the subsequent negotiations and achieved a lasting and favorable peace. Diocletian separated and enlarged the empires civil and military services and reorganized the empires provincial divisions establishing the largest and most bureaucratic government in the history of the empire. He established new administrative centers in Nicomedia Mediolanum Sirmium and Trevorum closer to the empires frontiers than the traditional capital at Rome. Building on thirdcentury trends towards absolutism he styled himself an autocrat elevating himself above the empires masses with imposing forms of court ceremonies and architecture. Bureaucratic and military growth constant campaigning and construction projects increased the states expenditures and necessitated a comprehensive tax reform. From at least 297 on imperial taxation was standardized made more equitable and levied at generally higher rates. Not all of Diocletians plans were successful the Edict on Maximum Prices 301 his attempt to curb inflation via price controls was counterproductive and quickly ignored. Although effective while he ruled Diocletians tetrarchic system collapsed after his abdication under the competing dynastic claims of Maxentius and Constantine sons of Maximian and Constantius respectively. The Diocletianic Persecution 303312 the empires last largest and bloodiest official persecution of Christianity failed to eliminate Christianity in the empire. After 324 Christianity became the empires preferred religion under Constantine. Despite these failures and challenges Diocletians reforms fundamentally changed the structure of the Roman imperial government and helped stabilize the empire economically and militarily enabling the empire to remain essentially intact for another 150 years despite being near the brink of collapse in Diocletians youth. Weakened by illness Diocletian left the imperial office on 1 May 305 becoming the first Roman emperor to abdicate the position voluntarily. He lived out his retirement in his palace on the Dalmatian coast tending to his vegetable gardens. His palace eventually became the core of the modernday city of Split in Croatia. Early lifeedit Panorama of amphitheatre in Salona Diocletian was born in Dalmatia probably at or near the town of Salona modern Solin Croatia to which he retired later in life. His original name was Diocles in full Gaius Valerius Diocles3 possibly derived from Dioclea the name of both his mother and her supposed place of birth.4 Diocletians official birthday was 22 December and his year of birth has been estimated at between 242 and 245 based on a statement that he was aged 68 at death alongside other evidence.5 His parents were of low status Eutropius records that he is said by most writers to have been the son of a scribe but by some to have been a freedman of a senator called Anulinus. The first forty years of his life are mostly obscure.6 Diocletian was considered an Illyricianus Illyrian who had been schooled and promoted by Aurelian.7 The 
12 thcentury Byzantine chronicler Joannes Zonaras states that he was Dux Moesiae8 a commander of forces on the lower Danube.9 The oftenunreliable Historia Augusta states that he served in Gaul but this is not corroborated by other sources and is ignored by modern historians.10 The first time Diocletians whereabouts are accurately established was in 282 when the Emperor Carus made him commander of the Protectores domestici the elite cavalry force directly attached to the Imperial household. This post earned him the honor of a consulship in 2
83.1 1 Death of Numerianedit Caruss death amid a successful war with Persia and in mysterious circumstances12  he was believed to have been struck by lightning or killed by Persian soldiers1314  left his sons Numerian and Carinus as the new Augusti. Carinus quickly made his way to Rome from his post in Gaul and arrived there by January 284 becoming the legitimate Emperor in the West. Numerian lingered in the East.15 The Roman withdrawal from Persia was orderly and unopposed.16 The Sassanid king Bahram II could not field an army against them as he was still struggling to establish his authority. By March 284 Numerian had only reached Emesa Homs in Syria by November only Asia Minor.1517 In Emesa he was apparently still alive and in good health he issued the only extant rescript in his name there
18 Note 2 but after he left the city his staff including the prefect Numerians fatherinlaw and the dominant influence in his entourage21 Aper reported that he suffered from an inflammation of the eyes. He traveled in a closed coach from then on.17 When the army reached Bithynia15 some of the soldiers smelled an odor emanating from the coach.16 They opened its curtains and found Numerian dead.1522 Both Eutropius and Aurelius Victor describe Numerians death as an assassination.23 Aper officially broke the news in Nicomedia zmit in November.24 Numerians generals and tribunes called a council for the succession and chose Diocles as Emperor1525 in spite of Apers attempts to garner support.24 On 20 November 284 the army of the east gathered on a hill 5 kilometres 
3.1  mi outside Nicomedia. The army unanimously saluted Diocles as their new Augustus and he accepted the purple imperial vestments. He raised his sword to the light of the sun and swore an oath disclaiming responsibility for Numerians death. He asserted that Aper had killed Numerian and concealed it.26 In full view of the army Diocles drew his sword and killed Aper.27 Soon after Apers death Diocles changed his name to the more Latinate Diocletianus28  in full Gaius Valerius Diocletianus.
3 Note 3 Conflict with Carinusedit Head of Carinus at the Centrale Montemartini After his accession Diocletian and Lucius Caesonius Bassus were named as consuls and assumed the fasces in place of Carinus and Numerian.29 Bassus was a member of a senatorial family from Campania a former consul and proconsul of Africa chosen by Probus for signal distinction.30 He was skilled in areas of government where Diocletian presumably had no experience.24 Diocletians elevation of Bassus symbolized his rejection of Carinus government in Rome his refusal to accept secondtier status to any other emperor30 and his willingness to continue the longstanding collaboration between the empires senatorial and military aristocracies.24 It also tied his success to that of the Senate whose support he would need in his advance on Rome.30 Diocletian was not the only challenger to Carinus rule the usurper Julianus Carinus corrector Venetiae took control of northern Italy and Pannonia after Diocletians accession.3132 Julianus minted coins from Siscia Sisak Croatia declaring himself emperor and promising freedom. This aided Diocletian in his portrayal of Carinus as a cruel and oppressive tyrant.33 Julianus forces were weak and were handily dispersed when Carinus armies moved from Britain to northern Italy. As the leader of the united East Diocletian was clearly the greater threat.31 Over the winter of 28485 Diocletian advanced west across the Balkans. In the spring some time before the end of May34 his armies met Carinus across the river Margus Great Morava in Moesia. In modern accounts the site has been located between the Mons Aureus Seone west of Smederevo and Viminacium30 near modern Belgrade Serbia.35 Despite having a stronger more powerful army Carinus held the weaker position. His rule was unpopular and it was later alleged that he had mistreated the Senate and seduced his officers wives.36 It is possible that Flavius Constantius the governor of Dalmatia and Diocletians associate in the household guard had already defected to Diocletian in the early spring.37 When the Battle of the Margus began Carinus prefect Aristobulus also defected.24 In the course of the battle Carinus was killed by his own men. Following Diocletians victory both the western and the eastern armies acclaimed him as Emperor.38 Diocletian exacted an oath of allegiance from the defeated army and departed for Italy.39 Early ruleedit Aureus of Diocletian minted c.288 Diocletian may have become involved in battles against the Quadi and Marcomanni immediately after the Battle of the Margus. He eventually made his way to northern Italy and made an imperial government but it is not known whether he visited Rome at this time.40 There is a contemporary issue of coins suggestive of an imperial adventus arrival for the city4142 but some modern historians state that Diocletian avoided the city to demonstrate that the city and its Senate were no longer politically relevant to the affairs of the empire.43 Diocletian dated his reign from his elevation by the army not his ratification by the Senate44 following the practice established by Carus who had declared the Senates ratification a useless formality.45 However Diocletian offered proof of his deference towards the Senate by retaining Aristobulus as ordinary consul and colleague for 285 one of the few instances during the Late Empire in which an emperor admitted a privatus as his colleague46 and by creating senior senators Vettius Aquilinus and Junius Maximus ordinary consuls for the following year  for Maximus it was his second consulship.47 If Diocletian did enter Rome shortly after his accession he did not stay long48 he is attested back in the Balkans by 2 November 285 on campaign against the Sarmatians.49 Possible head of Diocletian at the National Museum of Serbia Diocletian replaced the prefect of Rome with his consular colleague Bassus. Most officials who had served under Carinus however retained their offices under Diocletian.50 In an act of clementia denoted by the epitomator of Aurelius Victor as unusual51 Diocletian did not kill or depose Carinuss traitorous praetorian prefect and consul Aristobulus but confirmed him in both roles.52 He later gave him the proconsulate of Africa and the post of urban prefect for 2
95.5 3 The other figures who retained their offices might have also betrayed Carinus.54 Maximian made Caesaredit The assassinations of Aurelian and Probus demonstrated that sole rulership was dangerous to the stability of the empire.24 Conflict boiled in every province from Gaul to Syria Egypt to the lower Danube. It was too much for one person to control and Diocletian needed a lieutenant.55 According to EutropiusNote 4 Diocletian raised his fellowofficer Maximian to the office of Caesar making him his heir and effective coruler.5657 The concept of dual rulership was not new to the Roman Empire. Augustus the first emperor had nominally shared power with his colleagues and a formal office of coemperor coAugustus had existed from Marcus Aurelius onward.58 Most recently Emperor Carus and his sons had ruled together albeit unsuccessfully. Diocletian was in a less comfortable position than most of his predecessors as he had a daughter Valeria but no sons. His coruler had to be from outside his family raising the question of trust.59 Some historians state that Diocletian adopted Maximian as his filius Augusti his Augustan son upon his appointment to the throne following the precedent of some previous Emperors.60 This argument has not been universally accepted.61 Diocletian and Maximian added each others nomina their family name Valerius and Aurelius respectively to their own thus creating an artificial family link and becoming part of the Aurelius Valerius family.3 The relationship between Diocletian and Maximian was quickly couched in religious terms. Around 287 Diocletian assumed the title Iovius Jovius and Maximian assumed the title Herculius Hercules.62 The titles were probably meant to convey certain characteristics of their associated leaders. Diocletian in Jovian style would take on the dominating roles of planning and commanding Maximian in Herculian mode would act as Jupiters heroic subordinate.63 For all their religious connotations the emperors were not gods in the tradition of the Imperial cult  although they may have been hailed as such in Imperial panegyrics. Instead they were seen as the gods representatives effecting their will on earth.64 The shift from military acclamation to divine sanctification took the power to appoint emperors away from the army. Religious legitimization elevated Diocletian and Maximian above potential rivals in a way military power and dynastic claims could not.65 Conflict with Sarmatia and Persiaedit After his acclamation Maximian was dispatched to fight the rebel Bagaudae insurgent peasants of Gaul. Diocletian returned to the East progressing slowly.66 By 2 November he had only reached Civitas Iovia Botivo near Ptuj Slovenia.6768 In the Balkans during the autumn of 285 he encountered a tribe of Sarmatians who demanded assistance. The Sarmatians requested that Diocletian either help them recover their lost lands or grant them pasturage rights within the empire. Diocletian refused and fought a battle with them but was unable to secure a complete victory. The nomadic pressures of the European Plain remained and could not be solved by a single war soon the Sarmatians would have to be fought again.69 Diocletian wintered in Nicomedia.Note 5 There may have been a revolt in the eastern provinces at this time as he brought settlers from Asia to populate emptied farmlands in Thrace.72 He visited Syria Palaestina the following spring Note 6 His stay in the East saw diplomatic success in the conflict with Persia in 287 Bahram II granted him precious gifts declared open friendship with the Empire and invited Diocletian to visit him.76 Roman sources insist that the act was entirely voluntary.77 Around the same time perhaps in 28778 Persia relinquished claims on Armenia and recognized Roman authority over territory to the west and south of the Tigris. The western portion of Armenia was incorporated into the empire and made a province. Tiridates III the Arsacid claimant to the Armenian throne and a Roman client had been disinherited and forced to take refuge in the empire after the Persian conquest of 25253. In 287 he returned to lay claim to the eastern half of his ancestral domain and encountered no opposition.79 Bahram IIs gifts were widely recognized as symbolic of a victory in the ongoing conflict with Persia and Diocletian was hailed as the founder of eternal peace. The events might have represented a formal end to Caruss eastern campaign which probably ended without an acknowledged peace.80 At the conclusion of discussions with the Persians Diocletian reorganized the Mesopotamian frontier and fortified the city of Circesium Buseire Syria on the Euphrates.81 Maximian made Augustusedit Diocletian and Maximian on an aureus AD 287 Maximians campaigns were not proceeding as smoothly. The Bagaudae had been easily suppressed but Carausius the man he had put in charge of operations against Saxon and Frankish pirates on the Saxon Shore had according to literary sources begun keeping the goods seized from the pirates for himself. Maximian issued a death warrant for his larcenous subordinate. Carausius fled the Continent proclaimed himself emperor and agitated Britain and northwestern Gaul into open revolt against Maximian and Diocletian.82 Far more probable according to the archaeological evidence is that Carausius had held some important military post in Britain83 already had a firm basis of power in Britain and Northern Gaul and profited from the lack of legitimacy of the central government.84 Carausius strove to have his legitimacy as a junior emperor acknowledged by Diocletian in his coinage he extolled the concord between him and the central power. One bronze piece from 290 read PAX AVGGG the Peace of the three Augusti on the other side it showed Carausius together with Diocletian and Maximian with the caption CARAVSIVS ET FRATRES SVI Carausius  his brothers.8586 However Diocletian could not allow a breakaway regional usurper following in Postumuss footprints to enter of his own accord the imperial college.87 Spurred by the crisis on 1 April 286
88 Note 4 Maximian took up the title of Augustus emperor.93 Unusually Diocletian could not have been present to witness it. It has even been suggested that Maximian usurped the title and was only later recognized by Diocletian in hopes of avoiding civil war.94 This suggestion is unpopular as it is clear that Diocletian meant for Maximian to act with a certain amount of independence.95 It may be posited that Diocletian felt the need to bind Maximian closer to him by making him his empowered associate to avoid the possibility of him striking some sort of deal with Carausius.96 Carausius rebel emperor of Roman Britain. Most of the evidence for Carausiuss reign comes from his coinage which was of generally fine quality.97 Maximian realized that he could not immediately suppress the rogue commander so in 287 he campaigned against tribes beyond the Rhine instead.98 As Carausius was allied to the Franks Maximians campaigns could be seen as an effort to deny him a basis of support on the mainland.99 The following spring as Maximian prepared a fleet for an expedition against Carausius Diocletian returned from the East to meet Maximian. The two emperors agreed on a joint campaign against the Alamanni. Diocletian invaded Germania through Raetia while Maximian progressed from Mainz. Each burned crops and food supplies as he went destroying the Germans means of sustenance.100101 The two men added territory to the empire and allowed Maximian to continue preparations against Carausius without further disturbance.102 On his return to the East Diocletian managed what was probably another rapid campaign against the resurgent Sarmatians. No details survive but surviving inscriptions indicate that Diocletian took the title Sarmaticus Maximus after 2
89.1 03 In the East Diocletian engaged in diplomacy with desert tribes in the regions between Rome and Persia. He might have been attempting to persuade them to ally themselves with Rome thus reviving the old Romefriendly Palmyrene sphere of influence104 or to reduce the frequency of their incursions.105 No details survive for these events.106 Some of the princes of these states were Persian client kings a disturbing fact for the Romans in light of increasing tensions with the Sassanids.107 In the West Maximian lost the fleet built in 288 and 289 probably in the early spring of 290. The panegyrist who refers to the loss suggests that its cause was a storm108109 but this might have been an attempt to conceal an embarrassing military defeat.110 Diocletian broke off his tour of the Eastern provinces soon thereafter. He returned with haste to the West reaching Emesa by 10 May 290111112 and Sirmium on the Danube by 1 July 2
90.1 13114 Diocletian met Maximian in Milan either in late December 290 or January 2
91.1 15 The meeting was undertaken with a sense of solemn pageantry. The emperors spent most of their time in public appearances. It has been surmised that the ceremonies were arranged to demonstrate Diocletians continuing support for his faltering colleague.104 A deputation from the Roman Senate met with the emperors renewing its infrequent contact with the Imperial office.116117 The choice of Milan over Rome further snubbed the capitals pride. But then it was already a longestablished practice that Rome itself was only a ceremonial capital as the actual seat of the Imperial administration was determined by the needs of defense. Long before Diocletian Gallienus r. 25368 had chosen Milan for his headquarters.118 If the panegyric detailing the ceremony implied that the true center of the empire was not Rome but where the emperor sat ...the capital of the empire appeared to be there where the two emperors met119 it simply echoed what had already been stated by the historian Herodian in the early third century Rome is where the emperor is.118 During the meeting decisions on matters of politics and war were probably made in secret.120 The Augusti would not meet again until 3
03.1 04 Tetrarchyedit See also Tetrarchy Foundation of the Tetrarchyedit Map of the Tetrarchy in 293 showing the dioceses and the four tetrarchs zones of influence.121 Triumphal arch of the Tetrarchy Sbeitla Tunisia Some time after his return and before 293 Diocletian transferred command of the war against Carausius from Maximian to Flavius Constantius which he concluded successfully in 296. Constantius was a former governor of Dalmatia and a man of military experience stretching back to Aurelians campaigns against Zenobia 27273. He was Maximians praetorian prefect in Gaul and the husband to Maximians daughter Theodora. On 1 March 293 at Milan Maximian gave Constantius the office of caesar.122 The same day in either Philippopolis Plovdiv Bulgaria or Sirmium Diocletian did the same for Galerius husband to Diocletians daughter Valeria and perhaps Diocletians praetorian prefect.Note 7 Constantius was assigned Gaul and Britain. Galerius was initially assigned Syria Palestine Egypt and responsibility for the eastern borderlands.126 This arrangement is called the Tetrarchy from a Greek term meaning rulership by four.127 The Tetrarchs were more or less sovereign in their own lands and they travelled with their own imperial courts administrators secretaries and armies.128 They were joined by blood and marriage Diocletian and Maximian now styled themselves as brothers and formally adopted Galerius and Constantius as sons. These relationships implied a line of succession. Galerius and Constantius would become Augusti after the departure of Diocletian and Maximian. Maximians son Maxentius and Constantiuss son Constantine would then become Caesars. In preparation for their future roles Constantine and Maxentius were taken to Diocletians court in Nicomedia.129 Conflict in the Balkans and Egyptedit A Trajanic temple on the island of Philae the newly established border between the Nobatae and Blemmyes and Roman Egypt130 Diocletian spent the spring of 293 travelling with Galerius from Sirmium Sremska Mitrovica Serbia to Byzantium Istanbul Turkey. Diocletian then returned to Sirmium where he remained for the following winter and spring. He campaigned successfully against the Sarmatians in 294 probably in the autumn.131 The Sarmatians defeat kept them from the Danube provinces for a long time. Meanwhile Diocletian built forts north of the Danube132 part of a new defensive line called the Ripa Samartica at Aquincum Budapest Hungary Bononia Vidin Bulgaria Ulcisia Vetera Castra Florentium Intercisa Dunajvros Hungary and Onagrinum Bege Serbia.133 In 295 and 296 Diocletian campaigned in the region again and won a victory over the Carpi in the summer of 2
96.1 34 Later during both 299 and 302 as Diocletian was residing in the East it was Galeriuss turn to campaign victoriously on the Danube. By the end of his reign Diocletian had secured the entire length of the Danube provided it with forts bridgeheads highways and walled towns and sent fifteen or more legions to patrol the region an inscription at Sexaginta Prista on the Lower Danube extolled restored tranquility to the region.135 The defense came at a heavy cost but was a significant achievement in an area difficult to defend.136 Roman fresco on the southern wall of Luxor Temples imperial cult chamber. It depicts senior military officers gathered around Diocletians throne circa 2
80.1 37138 Galerius meanwhile was engaged during 291293 in disputes in Upper Egypt where he suppressed a regional uprising.135 He returned to Syria in 295 to fight the revanchist Persian empire.139 Diocletians attempts to bring the Egyptian tax system in line with Imperial standards stirred discontent and a revolt swept the region after Galeriuss departure.140 The usurper Domitius Domitianus declared himself Augustus in July or August 297. Much of Egypt including Alexandria recognized his rule.139 Diocletian moved into Egypt to suppress him first putting down rebels in the Thebaid in the autumn of 297131 then moving on to besiege Alexandria. Domitianus died in December 297141 by which time Diocletian had secured control of the Egyptian countryside. Alexandria whose defense was organized under Domitianuss former corrector Aurelius Achilleus held out probably until March 2
98.1 39141 Later in 298 a triumphal column was erected in Alexandria to honor Diocletian known as Pompeys Pillar.142 Bureaucratic affairs were completed during Diocletians stay143 a census took place and Alexandria in punishment for its rebellion lost the ability to mint independently.144 Diocletians reforms in the region combined with those of Septimius Severus brought Egyptian administrative practices much closer to Roman standards.145 Diocletian travelled south along the Nile the following summer where he visited Oxyrhynchus and Elephantine.144 In Nubia he made peace with the Nobatae and Blemmyes tribes. Under the terms of the peace treaty Romes borders moved north to Philae and the two tribes received an annual gold stipend. Diocletian left Africa quickly after the treaty moving from Upper Egypt in September 298 to Syria in February 299. He met with Galerius in Mesopotamia.130 War with Persiaedit See also RomanIranian relations and RomanPersian Wars Invasion counterinvasionedit Medallion of Diocletian AD 294 In 294 Narseh a son of Shapur who had been passed over for the Sassanid succession came to power in Persia.146 In early 294 Narseh sent Diocletian the customary package of gifts between the empires and Diocletian responded with an exchange of ambassadors. Within Persia Narseh was destroying every trace of his immediate predecessors from public monuments. He sought to identify himself with the warlike kings Ardashir I r. 226241 and Shapur I r. 241272 who had defeated and imprisoned Emperor Valerian r. 253260 following his failed invasion of the Sasanian Empire.147 Narseh declared war on Rome in 295 or 296. He appears to have first invaded western Armenia where he seized the lands delivered to Tiridates in the peace of 2
87.1 48149 He moved south into Roman Mesopotamia in 297 where he inflicted a severe defeat on Galerius in the region between Carrhae Harran Turkey and Callinicum Raqqa Syria suggested by the historian Fergus Millar to have been somewhere on the Balikh River.150 Diocletian may or may not have been present at the battle151 but he quickly divested himself of all responsibility. In a public ceremony at Antioch the official version of events was clear Galerius was responsible for the defeat Diocletian was not. Diocletian publicly humiliated Galerius forcing him to walk for a mile at the head of the Imperial caravan still clad in the purple robes of the Emperor.1521
53 Note 8 Detail of Galerius attacking Narseh on the Arch of Galerius at Thessaloniki Greece the city where Galerius carried out most of his administrative actions154155 Galerius was reinforced probably in the spring of 298 by a new contingent collected from the empires Danubian holdings.156 Narseh did not advance from Armenia and Mesopotamia leaving Galerius to lead the offensive in 298 with an attack on northern Mesopotamia via Armenia.1
57 Note 9 It is unclear if Diocletian was present to assist the campaign he might have returned to Egypt or Syria.Note 10 Narseh retreated to Armenia to fight Galeriuss force to Narsehs disadvantage the rugged Armenian terrain was favorable to Roman infantry but not to Sassanid cavalry. In two battles Galerius won major victories over Narseh. During the second encounter Roman forces seized Narsehs camp his treasury his harem and his wife.161 Galerius continued down the Tigris and took the Persian capital Ctesiphon before returning to Roman territory along the Euphrates.162 Peace negotiationsedit Narseh sent an ambassador to Galerius to plead for the return of his wives and children in the course of the war but Galerius dismissed him.163 Serious peace negotiations began in the spring of 299. The magister memoriae secretary of Diocletian and Galerius Sicorius Probus was sent to Narseh to present terms.163 The conditions of the resulting Peace of Nisibis were heavy164 Armenia returned to Roman domination with the fort of Ziatha as its border Caucasian Iberia would pay allegiance to Rome under a Roman appointee Nisibis now under Roman rule would become the sole conduit for trade between Persia and Rome and Rome would exercise control over the five satrapies between the Tigris and Armenia Ingilene Sophanene Sophene Arzanene Aghdznik Corduene Carduene and Zabdicene near modern Hakkri Turkey. These regions included the passage of the Tigris through the AntiTaurus range the Bitlis pass the quickest southerly route into Persian Armenia and access to the Tur Abdin plateau.165 A stretch of land containing the later strategic strongholds of Amida Diyarbakr Turkey and Bezabde came under firm Roman military occupation.166 With these territories Rome would have an advance station north of Ctesiphon and would be able to slow any future advance of Persian forces through the region.164 Many cities east of the Tigris came under Roman control including Tigranokert Saird Martyropolis Balalesa Moxos Daudia and Arzan  though under what status is unclear.166 At the conclusion of the peace Tiridates regained both his throne and the entirety of his ancestral claim.163 Rome secured a wide zone of cultural influence which led to a wide diffusion of Syriac Christianity from a center at Nisibis in later decades and the eventual Christianization of Armenia.164 To strengthen the defence of the east Diocletian had a fortified road constructed at the southern border where the empire bordered the Arabs in the year 300. This road would remain in use for centuries but proved ineffective in defending the border as conventional armies could not operate in the region.167 Religious persecutionsedit Further information Diocletianic Persecution Early persecutionsedit At the conclusion of the Peace of Nisibis Diocletian and Galerius returned to Antioch.155 At some time in 299 the emperors took part in a ceremony of sacrifice and divination in an attempt to predict the future. The haruspices were unable to read the entrails of the sacrificed animals and blamed Christians in the Imperial household. The emperors ordered all members of the court to perform a sacrifice to purify the palace. The emperors sent letters to the military command demanding the entire army perform the required sacrifices or face discharge.168169 Diocletian was conservative in matters of religion faithful to the traditional Roman pantheon and understanding of demands for religious purification170 but Eusebius Lactantius and Constantine state that it was Galerius not Diocletian who was the prime supporter of the purge.171172 Galerius even more devoted and passionate than Diocletian saw political advantage in the persecution. He was willing to break with a government policy of inaction on the issue.173 Antioch was Diocletians primary residence from 299 to 302 while Galerius swapped places with his Augustus on the Middle and Lower Danube.174 Diocletian visited Egypt once over the winter of 3012 and issued a grain dole in Alexandria.173 Following some public disputes with Manicheans Diocletian ordered that the leading followers of Mani be burnt alive along with their scriptures. In a 31 March 302 rescript from Alexandria he declared that lowstatus Manicheans must be executed by the blade and highstatus Manicheans must be sent to work in the quarries of Proconnesus Marmara Island Turkey or the mines of Phaeno in southern Palestine. All Manichean property was to be seized and deposited in the imperial treasury.175 Diocletian found much to be offended by in Manichean religion its novelty its alien origins its perceived corruption of Roman morals and its inherent opposition to longstanding religious traditions.176 His reasons for opposing Manichaeanism were also applied to his next target Christianity.177 Great Persecutionedit Catacomb of Saints Marcellinus and Peter on the Via Labicana. Christ between Peter and Paul. To the sides are the martyrs Gorgonius Peter Marcellinus Tiburtius. Diocletian returned to Antioch in the autumn of 302. He ordered that the deacon Romanus of Caesarea have his tongue removed for defying the order of the courts and interrupting official sacrifices. Romanus was then sent to prison where he was executed on 17 November 303. Diocletian left the city for Nicomedia in the winter accompanied by Galerius.178 According to Lactantius Diocletian and Galerius argued over imperial policy towards Christians while wintering at Nicomedia in 302. Diocletian believed that forbidding Christians from the bureaucracy and military would be sufficient to appease the gods but Galerius pushed for extermination. The two men sought the advice of the oracle of Apollo at Didyma.179180 The oracle responded that the impious on Earth hindered Apollos ability to provide advice. Rhetorically Eusebius records the Oracle as saying The just on Earth...181 These impious Diocletian was informed by members of the court could only refer to the Christians of the empire. At the behest of his court Diocletian acceded to demands for universal persecution.182 On 23 February 303 Diocletian ordered that the newly built church at Nicomedia be razed. He demanded that its scriptures be burned and seized its precious stores for the treasury.183 The next day Diocletians first Edict against the Christians was published.184 The edict ordered the destruction of Christian scriptures and places of worship across the empire and prohibited Christians from assembling for worship.185 Before the end of February a fire destroyed part of the Imperial palace.186 Galerius convinced Diocletian that the culprits were Christians conspirators who had plotted with the eunuchs of the palace. An investigation was commissioned but no responsible party was found. Executions followed anyway and the palace eunuchs Dorotheus and Gorgonius were executed. One individual Peter Cubicularius was stripped raised high and scourged. Salt and vinegar were poured in his wounds and he was slowly boiled over an open flame. The executions continued until at least 24 April 303 when six individuals including the bishop Anthimus were decapitated.187 A second fire occurred sixteen days after the first. Galerius left the city for Rome declaring Nicomedia unsafe.186 Diocletian would soon follow.187 Medallion of Diocletian c.AD 303 Although further persecutory edicts followed compelling the arrest of the Christian clergy and universal acts of sacrifice187 they were ultimately unsuccessful most Christians escaped punishment and pagans too were generally unsympathetic to the persecution. The martyrs sufferings strengthened the resolve of their fellow Christians.188 Constantius and Maximian did not apply the later edicts and left the Christians of the West unharmed.189 Galerius rescinded the edict in 311 announcing that the persecution had failed to bring Christians back to traditional religion.190 The temporary apostasy of some Christians and the surrendering of scriptures during the persecution played a major role in the subsequent Donatist controversy.191 Within twentyfive years of the persecutions inauguration the Christian emperor Constantine would rule the empire alone. He would reverse the consequences of the edicts and return all confiscated property to Christians.192 Under Constantines rule Christianity would become the empires preferred religion.193 Diocletian was demonized by his Christian successors Lactantius intimated that Diocletians ascendancy heralded the apocalypse.194195 Later lifeedit Illness and abdicationedit Reconstruction of the Palace of the Roman Emperor Diocletian in its original appearance upon completion in 305 by Ernest Hbrard Modernday Diocletians Palace 2012 as the core of the city of Split Diocletian entered the city of Rome in the early winter of 303. On 20 November he celebrated with Maximian the twentieth anniversary of his reign vicennalia the tenth anniversary of the Tetrarchy decennalia and a triumph for the war with Persia. Diocletian soon grew impatient with the city as the Romans acted towards him with what Edward Gibbon following Lactantius calls licentious familiarity.196 The Roman people did not give enough deference to his supreme authority it expected him to act the part of an aristocratic ruler not a monarchic one. On 20 December 303197 Diocletian cut short his stay in Rome and left for the north. He did not even perform the ceremonies investing him with his ninth consulate he did them in Ravenna on 1 January 304 instead.198 There are suggestions in the Panegyrici Latini and Lactantiuss account that Diocletian arranged plans for his and Maximians future retirement of power in Rome. Maximian according to these accounts swore to uphold Diocletians plan in a ceremony in the Temple of Jupiter.199 From Ravenna Diocletian left for the Danube. There possibly in Galeriuss company he took part in a campaign against the Carpi.197 He contracted a minor illness while on campaign but his condition quickly worsened and he chose to travel in a litter. In the late summer he left for Nicomedia. On 20 November 304 he appeared in public to dedicate the opening of the circus beside his palace. He collapsed soon after the ceremonies. Over the winter of 30405 he kept within his palace at all times. Rumors that Diocletians death was being kept secret until Galerius could assume power spread through the city. On 13 December it was falsely announced that Diocletian had killed himself. The city was sent into mourning from which it recovered after public declarations that Diocletian was still alive. When Diocletian reappeared in public on 1 March 305 he was emaciated and barely recognizable.200 Galerius arrived in the city later in March. According to Lactantius he came armed with plans to reconstitute the Tetrarchy force Diocletian to step down and fill the Imperial office with men compliant to his will. Through coercion and threats he eventually convinced Diocletian to comply with his plan. Lactantius also claims that he had done the same to Maximian at Sirmium.201200 Scholars doubt Lactantius account since he had a strong bias against Galerius and probably attempted to villainize him.202 On 1 May 305 Diocletian called an assembly of his generals traditional companion troops and representatives from distant legions. They met at the same hill 5 kilometres 
3.1  mi out of Nicomedia where Diocletian had been proclaimed emperor. In front of a statue of Jupiter his patron deity Diocletian addressed the crowd. With tears in his eyes he told them of his weakness his need for rest and his will to resign. He declared that he needed to pass the duty of empire on to someone stronger. He thus became the first and arguably only Roman emperor to voluntarily abdicate his title.2
03 Note 11 Most in the crowd believed that Constantine and Maxentius the only adult sons of reigning emperors who had long been preparing to succeed their fathers would be granted the title of Caesar. Constantine had travelled through Palestine at the right hand of Diocletian and was present at the palace in Nicomedia in 303 and 305. It is likely that Maxentius received the same treatment.204 In Lactantiuss account when Diocletian announced that he was to resign the entire crowd turned to face Constantine.205206 It was not to be Severus II and Maximinus II were declared caesars. Maximinus appeared and took Diocletians robes. On the same day Severus received his robes from Maximian in Milan. Constantius succeeded Maximian as Augustus of the West but Constantine and Maxentius were entirely ignored in the transition of power. This did not bode well for the future security of the tetrarchic system.207 Retirement and deathedit Modern view of the Peristyle in Diocletians Palace Split Croatia Diocletian retired to his homeland Dalmatia.208 He moved into the expansive Diocletians Palace a heavily fortified compound located by the small town of Spalatum on the shores of the Adriatic Sea and near the large provincial administrative center of Salona.209 The palace is preserved in great part to this day and forms the historic core of Split modernday Croatia where it was designated a World Heritage Site by UNESCO in 19
79.2 10 Maximian retired to villas in Campania or Lucania. Their homes were distant from political life but Diocletian and Maximian were close enough to remain in regular contact with each other.211 Galerius assumed the consular fasces in 308 with Diocletian as his colleague. In the autumn of 308 Galerius again conferred with Diocletian at Carnuntum PetronellCarnuntum Austria. Diocletian and Maximian were both present on 11 November 308 to see Galerius appoint Licinius to be Augustus in place of Severus who had died at the hands of Maxentius. He ordered Maximian who had attempted to return to power after his retirement to step down permanently. At Carnuntum people begged Diocletian to return to the throne to resolve the conflicts that had arisen through Constantines rise to power and Maxentiuss usurpation.212 Diocletians reply If you could show the cabbage that I planted with my own hands to your emperor he definitely wouldnt dare suggest that I replace the peace and happiness of this place with the storms of a neversatisfied greed.213 Diocletian lived for four more years spending his days in his palace gardens. He saw his tetrarchic system fail torn apart by the civil wars of his successors. He heard of Maximians third claim to the throne his forced suicide and his damnatio memoriae. In his own palace statues and portraits of his former companion emperor were torn down and destroyed. After an illness Diocletian died on 3 December 311 with some proposing that he took his own life in despair.2142
15 Note 12 Reformsedit Tetrarchic and ideologicaledit Head of Diocletian Getty Museum. Diocletian saw his work as that of a restorer a figure of authority whose duty it was to return the empire to peace to recreate stability and justice where barbarian hordes had destroyed it.216 He arrogated regimented and centralized political authority on a massive scale. In his policies he enforced an Imperial system of values on diverse and often unreceptive provincial audiences.217 In the Imperial propaganda from the period recent history was perverted and minimized in the service of the theme of the tetrarchs as restorers. Aurelians achievements were ignored the revolt of Carausius was backdated to the reign of Gallienus and it was implied that the tetrarchs engineered Aurelians defeat of the Palmyrenes the period between Gallienus and Diocletian was effectively erased. The history of the empire before the tetrarchy was portrayed as a time of civil war savage despotism and imperial collapse. In those inscriptions that bear their names Diocletian the founder of eternal peace and his companions are referred to as restorers of the whole world men who succeeded in defeating the nations of the barbarians and confirming the tranquility of their world. The theme of restoration was conjoined to an emphasis on the uniqueness and accomplishments of the tetrarchs themselves.218 The cities where emperors lived frequently in this period  Milan Trier Arles Sirmium Serdica Thessaloniki Nicomedia and Antioch  were treated as alternate imperial seats to the exclusion of Rome and its senatorial elite.219 A new style of ceremony was developed emphasizing the distinction of the emperor from all other persons. The quasirepublican ideals of Augustuss primus inter pares were abandoned for all but the tetrarchs themselves. Diocletian took to wearing a gold crown and jewels and forbade the use of purple cloth to all but the emperors.220 His subjects were required to prostrate themselves in his presence adoratio the most fortunate were allowed the privilege of kissing the hem of his robe proskynesis .221 Circuses and basilicas were designed to keep the face of the emperor perpetually in view and always in a seat of authority. The emperor became a figure of transcendent authority a man beyond the grip of the masses.222 His every appearance was stagemanaged.223 This style of presentation was not new  many of its elements were first seen in the reigns of Aurelian and Severus  but it was only under the tetrarchs that it was refined into an explicit system.224 Administrativeedit In keeping with his move from an ideology of republicanism to one of autocracy Diocletians council of advisers his consilium differed from those of earlier emperors. He destroyed the Augustan illusion of imperial government as a cooperative affair among emperor army and senate.223 In its place he established an effectively autocratic structure a shift later epitomized in the institutions name it would be called a consistorium not a council.2
25 Note 13 Diocletian regulated his court by distinguishing separate departments scrinia for different tasks.227 From this structure came the offices of different magistri like the magister officiorum Master of Offices and associated secretariats. These were men suited to dealing with petitions requests correspondence legal affairs and foreign embassies. Within his court Diocletian maintained a permanent body of legal advisers men with significant influence on his reordering of juridical affairs. There were also two finance ministers dealing with the separate bodies of the public treasury and the private domains of the emperor and the praetorian prefect the most significant person of the whole. Diocletians reduction of the Praetorian Guards to the level of a simple city garrison for Rome lessened the military powers of the prefect  although a prefect like Asclepiodotus was still a trained general  but the office retained much civil authority. The prefect kept a staff of hundreds and managed affairs in all segments of government in taxation administration jurisprudence and minor military commands the praetorian prefect was often second only to the emperor himself.228 Altogether Diocletian greatly increased the number of bureaucrats at the governments command Lactantius claimed that there were now more men using tax money than there were paying it.229 The historian Warren Treadgold estimates that under Diocletian the number of men in the civil service doubled from 15000 to 300
00.2 30 The classicist Roger S. Bagnall estimates that there was one bureaucrat for every 510000 people in Egypt based on 400 or 800 bureaucrats for 4 million inhabitants.2
31 Note 14 Jones estimated 30000 bureaucrats which he remarks is not an extravagant number given the size of the empire. He breaks down the bureaucracy as less than 12000 provincial officials and roughly 6000 diocesan officials. For the military he estimates a modest 300 officials per magister militum and 40 per dux for a total of about 5000 military officials. For the praetorian prefect and urban prefect he estimates approximately 5000 clerks. He comments that the expense the empire paid for these was not high as many lowerlevel clerks were not paid and the wage of higher officials was generally modest.233 To avoid the possibility of local usurpations234 to facilitate a more efficient collection of taxes and supplies and to ease the enforcement of the law Diocletian doubled the number of provinces from fifty to almost one hundred.235 The provinces were grouped into twelve dioceses each governed by an appointed official called a vicarius or deputy of the praetorian prefects.236 Some of the provincial divisions required revision and were modified either soon after 293 or early in the fourth century.237 Rome herself including her environs as defined by a 1
00 mile 160 kmradius perimeter around the city itself was not under the authority of the praetorian prefect as she was to be administered by a city prefect of senatorial rank  the sole prestigious post with actual power reserved exclusively for senators except for some governors in Italy with the titles of corrector and the proconsuls of Asia and Africa.238 The dissemination of imperial law to the provinces was facilitated by Diocletians reform of the Empires provincial structure which meant that there were now more governors praesides ruling over smaller regions and smaller populations.239 Diocletians reforms shifted the governors main function to that of the presiding official in the lower courts240 whereas in the early Empire military and judicial functions were the function of the governor and procurators had supervised taxation under the new system vicarii and governors were responsible for justice and taxation and a new class of duces dukes acting independently of the civil service had military command.241 These dukes sometimes administered two or three of the new provinces created by Diocletian and had forces ranging from two thousand to more than twenty thousand men.242 In addition to their roles as judges and tax collectors governors were expected to maintain the postal service cursus publicus and ensure that town councils fulfilled their duties.243 This curtailment of governors powers as the Emperors representatives may have lessened the political dangers of an alltoopowerful class of Imperial delegates but it also severely limited governors ability to oppose local landed elites especially those of senatorial status which although with reduced opportunities for office holding retained wealth social prestige and personal connections244 particularly in relatively peaceful regions without a great military presence.245 On one occasion Diocletian had to exhort a proconsul of Africa not to fear the consequences of treading on the toes of the local magnates of senatorial rank.246 If a governor of senatorial rank himself felt these pressures the difficulties faced by a mere praeses were likely greater.234 This led to a strained relationship between the central power and local elites sometime during 303 attempted military sedition in Seleucia Pieria and Antioch prompted Diocletian to extract bloody retribution on both cities by putting to death a number of their council members for failing in their duties of keeping order in their jurisdiction.247 Legaledit A 1581 reprint of the Digestorum from Justinians Corpus Juris Civilis 527534. The Corpus drew on the codices of Gregorius and Hermogenian drafted and published under Diocletians reign. As with most emperors much of Diocletians daily routine rotated around legal affairs  responding to appeals and petitions and delivering decisions on disputed matters. Rescripts authoritative interpretations issued by the emperor in response to demands from disputants in both public and private cases were a common duty of second and thirdcentury emperors. In the nomadic imperial courts of the later Empire one can track the progress of the imperial retinue through the locations from whence particular rescripts were issued  the presence of the Emperor was what allowed the system to function.248 Whenever the imperial court would settle in one of the capitals there was a glut in petitions as in late 294 in Nicomedia where Diocletian kept winter quarters.249 Admittedly Diocletians praetorian prefects  Afranius Hannibalianus Julius Asclepiodotus and Aurelius Hermogenianus  aided in regulating the flow and presentation of such paperwork but the deep legalism of Roman culture kept the workload heavy.250 Emperors in the forty years preceding Diocletians reign had not managed these duties so effectively and their output in attested rescripts is low. Diocletian by contrast was prodigious in his affairs there are around 1200 rescripts in his name still surviving and these probably represent only a small portion of the total issue.251 The sharp increase in the number of edicts and rescripts produced under Diocletians rule has been read as evidence of an ongoing effort to realign the whole Empire on terms dictated by the imperial center.252 Under the governance of the jurists Gregorius Aurelius Arcadius Charisius and Hermogenianus the imperial government began issuing official books of precedent collecting and listing all the rescripts that had been issued since the reign of Hadrian r. 117
38.2 53 The Codex Gregorianus includes rescripts up to 292 which the Codex Hermogenianus updated with a comprehensive collection of rescripts issued by Diocletian in 293 and 2
94.2 37 Although the very act of codification was a radical innovation given the precedentbased design of the Roman legal system254 the jurists were generally conservative and constantly looked to past Roman practice and theory for guidance.255 They were probably given more free rein over their codes than the later compilers of the Codex Theodosianus 438 and Codex Justinianus 529 would have. Gregorius and Hermogenianuss codices lack the rigid structuring of later codes256 and were not published in the name of the emperor but in the names of their compilers.257 Their official character was clear in that both collections were acknowledged by courts as authoritative records of imperial legislation up to the date of their publication and regularly updated.258 After Diocletians reform of the provinces governors were called iudex or judge. The governor became responsible for his decisions first to his immediate superiors as well as to the more distant office of the emperor.259 It was most likely at this time that judicial records became verbatim accounts of what was said in trial making it easier to determine bias or improper conduct on the part of the governor. With these records and the Empires universal right of appeal Imperial authorities probably had a great deal of power to enforce behavior standards for their judges.260 In spite of Diocletians attempts at reform the provincial restructuring was far from clear especially when citizens appealed the decisions of their governors. Proconsuls for example were often both judges of first instance and appeal and the governors of some provinces took appellant cases from their neighbors. It soon became impossible to avoid taking some cases to the emperor for arbitration and judgment.261 Diocletians reign marks the end of the classical period of Roman law. Where Diocletians system of rescripts shows adherence to classical tradition Constantines law is full of Greek and eastern influences.262 Partly in response to economic pressures and in order to protect the vital functions of the state Diocletian restricted social and professional mobility. Peasants became tied to the land in a way that presaged later systems of land tenure and workers such as bakers armorers public entertainers and workers in the mint had their occupations made hereditary.263 Soldiers children were also forcibly enrolled something that followed spontaneous tendencies among the rankandfile but also expressed increasing difficulties in recruitment.264 Militaryedit See also Late Roman army Diocletian It is archaeologically difficult to distinguish Diocletians fortifications from those of his successors and predecessors. The Devils Dykes for examplethe Danubian earthworks traditionally attributed to Diocletiancannot even be securely dated to a particular century. The most that can be said about built structures under Diocletians reign is that he rebuilt and strengthened forts at the Upper Rhine frontier where he followed the works built under Probus along the Lake ConstanceBasel and the RhineIllerDanube line265 on the Danube where a new line of forts on the far side of the river the Ripa Sarmatica was added to older rehabilitated fortresses266 in Egypt and on the frontier with Persia. Beyond that much discussion is speculative and reliant on the broad generalizations of written sources. Diocletian and the tetrarchs had no consistent plan for frontier advancement and records of raids and forts built across the frontier are likely to indicate only temporary claims. The Strata Diocletiana built after the Persian Wars which ran from the Euphrates North of Palmyra and South towards northeast Arabia in the general vicinity of Bostra is the classic Diocletianic frontier system consisting of an outer road followed by tightly spaced forts  defensible hardpoints manned by small garrisons  followed by further fortifications in the rear.266267 In an attempt to resolve the difficulty and slowness of transmitting orders to the frontier the new capitals of the tetrarchic era were all much closer to the empires frontiers than Rome had been268 Trier sat on the Moselle a tributary of the Rhine Sirmium and Serdica were close to the Danube Thessaloniki was on the route leading eastward and Nicomedia and Antioch were important points in dealings with Persia.269 Lactantius criticized Diocletian for an excessive increase in troop sizes declaring that each of the four princes strove to maintain a much more considerable military force than any sole emperor had done in times past. There began to be fewer men who paid taxes than there were who received wages so that the means of the husbandmen being exhausted by enormous impositions the farms were abandoned cultivated grounds became woodland and universal dismay prevailed.229 The fifthcentury pagan Zosimus by contrast praised Diocletian for keeping troops on the borders rather than keeping them in the cities as Constantine was held to have done.270 Both these views had some truth to them despite the biases of their authors Diocletian and the tetrarchs did greatly expand the army and the growth was mostly in frontier regions where the increased effectiveness of the new Diocletianic legions seem to have been mostly spread across a network of strongholds.264 Nevertheless it is difficult to establish the precise details of these shifts given the weakness of the sources.271230 The army expanded to about 580000 men from a 285 strength of 390000 of which 310000 men were stationed in the East most of whom manned the Persian frontier. The navy increased from approximately 45000 to approximately 65000 men.2
30 Note 15 Diocletians expansion of the army and civil service meant that the empires tax burden grew. Since military upkeep took the largest portion of the imperial budget any reforms here would be especially costly. The proportion of the adult male population excluding slaves serving in the army increased from roughly 1 in 25 to 1 in 15 an increase judged excessive by some modern commentators. Official troop allowances were kept to low levels and the mass of troops often resorted to extortion or the taking of civilian jobs. Arrears became the norm for most troops. Many were even given payment in kind in place of their salaries. Were he unable to pay for his enlarged army there would likely be civil conflict potentially open revolt. Diocletian was led to devise a new system of taxation.274 Economicedit Taxationedit Main article CapitatioIugatio In the early empire 30 BC  AD 235 the Roman government paid for what it needed in gold and silver. The coinage was stable. Requisition forced purchase was used to supply armies on the march. During the thirdcentury crisis 235285 the government resorted to requisition rather than payment in debased coinage since it could never be sure of the value of money. Requisition was nothing more or less than seizure. Diocletian made requisition into tax. He introduced an extensive new tax system based on heads capita and land iugera  with one iugerum equal to approximately 
0.6 5 acres  and tied to a new regular census of the empires population and wealth. Census officials traveled throughout the empire assessed the value of labor and land for each landowner and joined the landowners totals together to make citywide totals of capita and iuga.275 The iugum was not a consistent measure of land but varied according to the type of land and crop and the amount of labor necessary for sustenance. The caput was not consistent either women for instance were often valued at half a caput and sometimes at other values.276 Cities provided animals money and manpower in proportion to its capita and grain in proportion to its iuga.2
75 Note 16 Most taxes were due each year on 1 September and levied from individual landowners by decuriones decurions. These decurions analogous to city councilors were responsible for paying from their own pocket what they failed to collect.278 Diocletians reforms also increased the number of financial officials in the provinces more rationales and magistri privatae are attested under Diocletians reign than before. These officials represented the interests of the fisc which collected taxes in gold and the Imperial properties.237 Fluctuations in the value of the currency made collection of taxes in kind the norm although these could be converted into coin. Rates shifted to take inflation into account.275 In 296 Diocletian issued an edict reforming census procedures. This edict introduced a general fiveyear census for the whole empire replacing prior censuses that had operated at different speeds throughout the empire. The new censuses would keep up with changes in the values of capita and iuga.279 Italy which had long been exempt from taxes was included in the tax system from 290291 as a diocesis.280 The city of Rome remained exempt the regions i.e. provinces South of Rome generally called suburbicarian as opposed to the Northern annonaria region seem to have been relatively less taxed in what probably was a sop offered to the great senatorial families and their landed properties.281 Diocletians edicts emphasized the common liability of all taxpayers. Public records of all taxes were made public.282 The position of decurion member of the city council had been an honor sought by wealthy aristocrats and the middle classes who displayed their wealth by paying for city amenities and public works. Decurions were made liable for any shortfall in the amount of tax collected. Many tried to find ways to escape the obligation.278 By 300 civilians across the empire complained that there were more tax collectors than there were people to pay taxes.283 Currency and inflationedit A fragment of the Edict on Maximum Prices 301 on display in Berlin Part of the prices edict in Greek in its original area built into a medieval church Geraki Greece Aurelians attempt to reform the currency had failed the denarius was dead.284 Diocletian restored the threemetal coinage and issued better quality pieces.285 The new system consisted of five coins the aureussolidus a gold coin weighing like its predecessors onesixtieth of a pound the argenteus a coin weighing one ninetysixth of a pound and containing ninetyfive percent pure silver the follis sometimes referred to as the laureatus A which is a copper coin with added silver struck at the rate of thirtytwo to the pound the radiatus a small copper coin struck at the rate of 108 to the pound with no added silver and a coin known today as the laureatus B a smaller copper coin struck at the rate of 192 to the pound.2
86 Note 17 Since the nominal values of these new issues were lower than their intrinsic worth as metals the state was minting these coins at a loss. This practice could be sustained only by requisitioning precious metals from private citizens in exchange for stateminted coin of a far lower value than the price of the precious metals requisitioned.287 By 301 the system was in trouble strained by a new bout of inflation. Diocletian therefore issued his Edict on Coinage an act retariffing all debts so that the nummus the most common coin in circulation would be worth half as much.288 In the edict preserved in an inscription from the city of Aphrodisias in Caria near Geyre Turkey it was declared that all debts contracted before 1 September 301 must be repaid at the old standards while all debts contracted after that date would be repaid at the new standards.289 It appears that the edict was made in an attempt to preserve the current price of gold and to keep the Empires coinage on silver Romes traditional metal currency.290 This edict risked giving further momentum to inflationary trends as had happened after Aurelians currency reforms. The governments response was to issue a price freeze.287 The Edict on Maximum Prices Edictum De Pretiis Rerum Venalium was issued two to three months after the coinage edict284 somewhere between 20 November and 10 December 3
01.2 89 The bestpreserved Latin inscription surviving from the Greek East289 the edict survives in many versions on materials as varied as wood papyrus and stone.284291 In the edict Diocletian declared that the current pricing crisis resulted from the unchecked greed of merchants and had resulted in turmoil for the mass of common citizens. The language of the edict calls on the peoples memory of their benevolent leaders and exhorts them to enforce the provisions of the edict thereby restoring perfection to the world. The edict goes on to list in detail over one thousand goods and accompanying retail prices not to be exceeded. Penalties are laid out for various pricing transgressions.292 In the most basic terms the edict was ignorant of the law of supply and demand it ignored the fact that prices might vary from region to region according to product availability and it ignored the impact of transportation costs in the retail price of goods. In the judgment of the historian David Potter the edict was an act of economic lunacy.293 The fact that the edict began with a long rhetorical preamble betrays at the same time a moralizing stance as well as a weak grasp of economics  perhaps simply the wishful thinking that criminalizing a practice was enough to stop it. There is no consensus about how effectively the edict was enforced.294 Supposedly inflation speculation and monetary instability continued and a black market arose to trade in goods forced out of official markets.295 The edicts penalties were applied unevenly across the empire some scholars believe they were applied only in Diocletians domains287 widely resisted and eventually dropped perhaps within a year of the edicts issue.296 Lactantius has written of the perverse accompaniments to the edict of goods withdrawn from the market of brawls over minute variations in price of the deaths that came when its provisions were enforced. His account may be true but it seems to modern historians exaggerated and hyperbolic297 and the impact of the law is recorded in no other ancient source.298 Legacyedit See also Dominate The monolithic granite column shaft of the Diocletianic honorific column in the Serapeum of Alexandria called Pompeys Pillar is 
20.7 5 metres 
68.1  ft tall. Built 298303. The historian A.H.M. Jones observed that It is perhaps Diocletians greatest achievement that he reigned twentyone years and then abdicated voluntarily and spent the remaining years of his life in peaceful retirement.299 Diocletian was one of the few emperors of the third and fourth centuries to die naturally and the first in the history of the empire to retire voluntarily.300 Once he retired his tetrarchic system collapsed. Without the guiding hand of Diocletian the empire fell into civil wars. Stability emerged after the defeat of Licinius by Constantine in 3
24.3 01 Under the Christian Constantine Diocletian was maligned. Constantines rule however demonstrated the benefits of Diocletians achievements and the autocratic principle he represented the borders remained secure in spite of Constantines large expenditure of forces during his civil wars the bureaucratic transformation of the Roman government was completed and Constantine took Diocletians court ceremonies and made them even more extravagant.302 Constantine ignored those aspects of Diocletians reign that did not suit him. Diocletians policy of preserving a stable silver coinage was abandoned and the gold solidus became the empires primary currency instead. Diocletians persecution of Christians was repudiated and changed to a policy of toleration and then favoritism. Christianity eventually became the official religion in 380. Most importantly Diocletians tax system and administrative reforms lasted with some modifications until the advent of the Muslims in the 6
30 s. The combination of state autocracy and state religion was instilled in much of Europe particularly in the lands which adopted Orthodox Christianity.303 The Era of Martyrs Latin anno martyrum or AM also known as the Diocletian era Latin anno Diocletiani is a method of numbering years used by the Church of Alexandria beginning in the 
4 th century anno Domini and by the Coptic Orthodox Church of Alexandria from the 
5 th century to the present. In this system of counting the beginning of Diocletians reign in 284 was used as the epoch making Diocletians first year in power into the Year 1 of that calendar. Western Christians were aware of this count but did not use it Dionysius Exiguus replaced the anno Diocletiani era with his anno Domini era because he did not wish to continue the memory of a tyrant who persecuted Christians.304 Dukljan a major villain in Serbian mythology who is presented as the adversary of God305 is considered to be a mythological reflection of the historical Diocletian.306 The Talmud includes several semilegendary accounts of Diocletian. One of them recounts that Diocletian was originally a swineherd and that in this part of his life he was teased and abused by young Jews. When he became the Emperor he called up the leaders of the Jews who were fearful saying We have teased Diocletian the Swineherd but we respect Diocletian the Emperor  to which Diocletian responded You must show respect even to the smallest and lowest of the Romans because you can never know which one of us will rise to greatness.307308 Notesedit  Contested until July 2
85.1   Coins were issued in his name in Cyzicus some time before the end of 284 but it is impossible to know whether he was still in the public eye by that point.1920  He initially reigned under the name Marcus Aurelius Gaius Valerius Diocletianus but this formula didnt last long. He reverted back to Gaius Valerius Diocles after his retirement.3  a b The chronology of Maximians appointment as coruler is somewhat uncertain.89 Some argue that Maximian was appointed Augustus without ever holding the office of Caesar.90 1 April 286 the date given by the 
5 thcentury Consularia Constantinopolitana is the most common date used in modern histories for Maximians dies imperii.88 However a document dated to 31 March 286 already shows Diocletian and Maximian as joint emperors. The CAH dates the assumption of the Augustan title to 1 March 2
86.9 1 According to a recent view Maximian was appointed Augustus without ever being Caesar on or around 13 December 2
85.9 2  He is placed there by a rescript dated 3 March 2
86.7 071  He is attested there in a rescript dated 31 May 2
87.7 374 The Jewish Midrash suggests that Diocletian resided at Panias presentday Banias in the northern Golan Heights.75  The contemporary Lactantius gives 1 March123 while the 
7 thcentury Chronicon Paschale gives 21 May.124 Still not all authors agree on the exact date.125  It is possible that Galeriuss position at the head of the caravan was merely the conventional organization of an imperial progression designed to show a caesars deference to his augustus and not an attempt to humiliate him.154  Faustus of Byzantiums history refers to a battle that took place after Galerius set up base at Satala Sadak Turkey in Armenia Minor when Narseh advanced from his base at Oskha to attack him.158  Lactantius criticizes Diocletian for his absence from the front159 but Southern dating Diocletians African campaigns one year earlier than Barnes places Diocletian on Galeriuss southern flank.160  Diocletian almost certainly abdicated because of his advanced age and illness but he also had a specific succession plan.202 Maximian was reluctant to abdicate and later attempted to usurp power twice. Three more emperors abdicated in the later Eastern Empire Staurakios r.811 Michael I r.811813 and Isaac I r.105759 but all of them where forced to abdicate by a new emperor.  The range of dates proposed for Diocletians death have stretched from 311 through to 318. Until recently the date of 3 December 311 has been favored however the absence of Diocletian on Maxentiuss AETERNA MEMORIA coins could indicate that he was alive through to Maxentiuss defeat in October 312. Given that Diocletian had died by the time of Maximin Daias death in July 313 it has been argued that the correct date of death was 3 December 3
12.2 14  The term consistorium was already in use for the room where council meetings took place.226  No one knows the population of the province in 300 AD Strabo 300 years earlier put it at 
7.5  million excluding Alexandria. By comparison the ratio in 
12 thcentury Song dynasty China was one bureaucrat for every 15000 people.232  The 
6 thcentury author John the Lydian provides extraordinarily precise troop numbers 389704 in the army and 45562 in the navy.272 His precision has polarized modern historians. Some believe that Lydus found these figures in official documents and that they are therefore broadly accurate others believe that he fabricated them.273  The army recruitment tax was called the praebitio tironum and conscripted a part of each landowners tenant farmers coloni. When a capitulum extended across many farms farmers provided the funds to compensate the neighbor who had supplied the recruit. Landowners of senatorial rank were able to commute the tax with a payment in gold the aurum tironicum.277  The denarius was dropped from the Imperial mints284 but the values of new coins continued to be measured in reference to it.285 Referencesedit  Barnes 1982 p. 4.  Barnes 1982 pp. 30 46 CAH p. 68.  a b c d Cambi Nenad 2012. Tetrarchic Practice in Name Giving. In A. Demandt A. Goltz H. SchlangeSchningen eds.. Diokletian und die Tetrarchie. Vol. 98. Berlin De Gruyter. pp. 3845. ISBN 9783110914603. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 15 May 2022.  Barnes 1982 p. 31 Williams 1985 pp. 22 237 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1982 pp. 3031 Williams 1985 pp. 22 238 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Eutropius 
9.1 9 Barnes 1981 p. 4 CAH p. 68 Potter 2005 pp. 2223.  Wilkes John J. 1992. The Illyrians. Oxford Blackwell Publishing. p. 263. ISBN 0631198075. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 17 September 2021.  Zonaras 
12.3 1 Southern 2001 Williams 1985 p. 26 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Mathisen 1997 Williams 1985 p. 26 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Historia Augusta Vita Carini 1415 Williams 1985 p. 26 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Williams 1985 p. 33. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Williams 1985 p. 36. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Mommsen Theodor 1999 1856. A History of Rome Under the Emperors. Barbara Demandt Alexander Demandt Thomas E. J. Wiedemann. London Routledge. pp. 346348. ISBN 9780415206471. Archived from the original on 22 December 2022. Retrieved 22 December 2022. Those accounts we do possess stem from outsiders who in fact know nothing.  Harries Jill 2012. Imperial Rome AD 284 to 363 The New Empire. Edinburgh Edinburgh University Press. p. 27. ISBN 9780748620524. JSTOR 
10.3 3
66 j.ctt
1 g
0 b463. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 17 February 2023.  a b c d e Barnes 1981 p. 4.  a b Southern 2001 p. 133.  a b Leadbetter 20
01 a.  Cod. Justinianus 
5.5 
2.2  Leadbetter 20
01 a Potter 2005 p. 279.  Roman Imperial Coinage Vol. 
5.2  Numerian no. 462  Potter 2005 pp. 279280.  Williams 1985 p. 34. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Leadbetter 20
01 a Odahl 2004 p. 39 Williams 1985 p. 35 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Eutropius 
9.1 9 Epit. Caesaribus 
39.1 .  a b c d e f Potter 2005 p. 280.  CAH p. 68 Williams 1985 pp. 435436 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 45 Odahl 2004 pp. 3940 Williams 1985 pp. 3637 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 45 Leadbetter 20
01 a Odahl 2004 pp. 3940 Williams 1985 p. 37 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Corcoran 2006 p. 39.  Barnes 1981 p. 5 CAH p. 69 Potter 2005 p. 280 Southern 2001 p. 134.  a b c d Barnes 1981 p. 5.  a b Barnes 1981 p. 5 CAH p. 69 Leadbetter 20
01 b.  Southern 2001 pp. 134135 Williams 1985 p. 38 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help Banchich 1997.  Southern 2001 pp. 134135 Williams 1985 p. 38 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  CAH p. 69 Potter 2005 p. 280.  Barnes 1981 p. 5 Odahl 2004 p. 40 Southern 2001 p. 135.  Barnes 1981 p. 5 Williams 1985 pp. 3738 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Potter 2005 p. 280 Williams 1985 p. 37 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 5 CAH p. 69 Odahl 2004 p. 40 Williams 1985 p. 38 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 p. 135 Williams 1985 p. 38 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 5 CAH p. 69.  Roman Imperial Coinage Vol 

5.2.2 41 no. 203204  Barnes 1981 p. 5 Barnes 1982 p. 50.  Williams 1997 p. 41.  Williams 1985 p. 41. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Epit. Caesaribus 
37.5 .  Barnes Timothy D. 1998. Ammianus Marcellinus and the Representation of Historical Reality. Ithaca Cornell University Press. p. 46. ISBN 0801435269.  PLRE Vol 1 M. Iunius Maximus 38 p. 587.  Southern 2001 pp. 135 331.  Potter 2005 p. 281.  Barnes 1981 pp. 56 CAH p. 69 Barnes 1982 p. 113 Williams 1985 pp. 4142 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Epit. Caesaribus 
39.1 5.  Barnes 1975 p. 46 Barnes 1981 pp. 56 Leadbetter 20
01 b Williams 1985 p. 41 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Leadbetter 20
01 b.  Barnes 1975 p. 46 Barnes 1981 pp. 56 Leadbetter 20
01 b.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Southern 2001 p. 136.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Barnes 1982 p. 4 CAH p. 69.  Bleckmann 2006 Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Potter 2005 pp. 280281 Williams 1985 p. 4345 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Williams 1985 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Potter 2005 p. 280 Southern 2001 p. 135 Williams 1985 p. 38 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Odahl 2004 pp. 4243 Williams 1985 p. 45 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  CAH p. 69 Southern 2001 p. 136.  CAH pp. 7071 Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Liebeschuetz 1979 pp. 235252 Odahl 2004 pp. 4344 Williams 1985 pp. 5859 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 1112 CAH pp. 7071 Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Odahl 2004 p. 43 Southern 2001 pp. 136137 Williams 1985 p. 58 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 11 CAH p. 172.  Williams 1985 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help CAH p. 171.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Southern 2001 p. 137.  Codex Justinianus 
4.4 
8.5  Fragmenta Vaticana 297  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Barnes 1982 p. 50 Potter 2005 p. 281.  Southern 2001 p. 143 Williams 1985 p. 52 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Fragmenta Vaticana 275  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Potter 2005 pp. 281 649.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Panegyrici Latini 85
21.1 .  Cod. Justinianus 
4.1 
0.3  
1.5 
1.1  
5.1 
7.3 .  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Barnes 1982 pp. 5051 Potter 2005 pp. 281 649.  Midrash Rabba Genesis Ed. Vilna Parashas Toledos 638.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 Millar 1993 p. 177.  Southern 2001 p. 242.  Barnes 1982 p. 51 CAH p. 73.  Barnes 1981 p. 6 CAH p. 73 Potter 2005 pp. 292 651 Southern 2001 p. 143 Williams 1985 p. 52 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 pp. 242 360361.  CAH p. 73 Millar 1993 pp. 180181 Southern 2001 p. 143 Williams 1985 p. 52 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 67 CAH pp. 7071 Potter 2005 pp. 283284 Southern 2001 pp. 137141 Williams 1985 pp. 4547 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 p. 138.  Potter 2005 p. 284.  Southern 2001 pp. 138 140.  Stephen J. Murray 2021. New Empires. From Dot To Domesday  British History. Archived from the original on 14 October 2021. Retrieved 20 January 2023.  Williams 1985 pp. 6162. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  a b Barnes 1981 pp. 67 CAH p. 69 Potter 2005 p. 282 Southern 2001 pp. 141142 Williams 1985 pp. 4748 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Southern 2001 p. 142.  Potter 2005 p. 281 Southern 2001 p. 142 following De Caesaribus 
39.1 7.  CAH p. 69 following BGU 
4.1 0
90.3 4.  Burgess 2023 Nixon  Rodgers 2023 pp. 4451.  Barnes 1981 p. 7 Bleckmann 2006 Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Potter 2005 p. 282 Southern 2001 pp. 141142 Williams 1985 p. 48 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Potter 2005 p. 649.  Potter 2005 p. 282 Williams 1985 p. 49 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 p. 141.  Southern 2001 p. 140.  Barnes 1981 p. 7 CAH p. 71 Corcoran 2006 p. 40.  Williams 1985 p. 62. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Rees Roger 2002. Layers of Loyalty in Latin Panegyric. Oxford Oxford University Press. doi
10.1 0
93 acprofoso97801992491
83.0 
01.0 001. ISBN 9780199249183.  Southern 2001 pp. 142143 Williams 1985 p. 50 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 7 Corcoran 2006 p. 40 Southern 2001 p. 143.  Barnes 1982 p. 255 Southern 2001 p. 144.  a b c Potter 2005 p. 285.  Williams 1985 p. 63. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Southern 2001 p. 144.  Williams 1985 p. 78. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Panegyrici Latini 85
12.2   Barnes 1981 pp. 7 288 Potter 2005 pp. 284285 650 Southern 2001 p. 143 Williams 1985 p. 55 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 p. 143 Williams 1985 p. 55 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Cod. Justinianus 
9.4 
1.9 .  Barnes 1982 p. 51 Potter 2005 pp. 285 650.  Cod. Justinianus 
6.3 
0.6 .  Barnes 1982 p. 52 Potter 2005 pp. 285 650.  Barnes 1981 p. 8 Barnes 1982 p. 52 Potter 2005 p. 285.  Panegyrici Latini 11
32.4  
8.1  
11.3 4 
12.2 .  Barnes 1981 pp. 8 288 Potter 2005 pp. 285 650 Williams 1985 p. 56 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  a b Elsner 1998 p. 73.  Williams 1985 p. 57 quoting the Panegyrici Latini 11312. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Barnes 1981 p. 8 Potter 2005 pp. 285 288.  The Roman Empire and the Tetrarchy of Diocletian 293  305 CE World History Encyclopedia  Barnes 1981 pp. 89 Barnes 1982 pp. 4 3637 Potter 2005 p. 288 Southern 2001 p. 146 Williams 1985 pp. 6465 7374 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Lactantius 35.  Chronicon Paschale O. 268  Barnes 1981 pp. 89 Barnes 1982 p. 4 38 Potter 2005 p. 288 Southern 2001 p. 146 Williams 1985 pp. 6465 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 89 Williams 1985 p. 67 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Southern 2001 p. 145.  Corcoran 2006 pp. 4546 Williams 1985 p. 67 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 pp. 89.  a b Barnes 1981 pp. 1718.  a b Odahl 2004 p. 59.  Barnes 1981 p. 17 Williams 1985 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Williams 1985 p. 76. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Barnes 1981 p. 17 Odahl 2004 p. 59 Southern 2001 pp. 149150.  a b Carri  Rousselle 1999 pp. 163164.  Williams 1985 p. 77. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Chapel of Imperial Cult. Madain Project. Retrieved 24 December 2023.  Davenport Caillan McEvoy Meaghan 23 January 2024. The Roman Imperial Court in the Principate and Late Antiquity. Oxford University Press. pp. 8687. ISBN 9780192865236.  a b c Barnes 1981 p. 17.  Barnes 1981 p. 17 Southern 2001 pp. 160 338.  a b DiMaio 1997.  Delbrck 2007 pp. 100101.  Barnes 1981 pp. 1718 Southern 2001 p. 150.  a b Southern 2001 p. 150.  Harries 1999 p. 173.  Potter 2005 p. 292 Williams 1985 p. 69 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Williams 1985 pp. 6970. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Ammianus Marcellinus 

23.5.1 1  Barnes 1981 p. 17 CAH p. 81 Potter 2005 p. 292 Southern 2001 p. 149.  Eutropius 
9.2 425 Barnes 1981 p. 17 CAH p. 81 Millar 1993 pp. 177178.  Potter 2005 p. 652.  Eutropius 
9.2 425 Theophanes Confessor AM 5793.  Barnes 1981 p. 17 CAH p. 81 Potter 2005 pp. 292293.  a b Rees 2004 p. 14.  a b Southern 2001 p. 151.  Barnes 1981 p. 18 CAH p. 81 Millar 1993 p. 178.  Millar 1993 p. 178 Potter 2005 p. 293.  CAH p. 81.  Lactantius 
9.6 .  Southern 2001 pp. 151 335336.  Barnes 1981 p. 18 Potter 2005 p. 293.  Barnes 1981 p. 18 Millar 1993 p. 178.  a b c Barnes 1981 p. 18.  a b c Potter 2005 p. 293.  Millar 1993 pp. 178179 Potter 2005 p. 293.  a b Millar 1993 p. 178.  Heather P. J. Peter J. 2018. Rome Resurgent War and Empire in the Age of Justinian. New York Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199362745. OCLC 1007044617.  Lactantius 
10.1 5 Barnes 1981 pp. 1819 Burgess 1996 pp. 157158 Helgeland 1974 p. 159 Liebeschuetz 1979 pp. 246248 Odahl 2004 p. 65.  Barnes Timothy D. 1976. Sossianus Hierocles and the Antecedents of the Great Persecution. Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 80 239252. doi
10.2 307311244. JSTOR 311244.  Barnes 1981 p. 20 Corcoran 2006 p. 51 Odahl 2004 p. 62.  Lactantius 
10.6  
31.1  Eusebius 8 a1 3 Constantine I Oratio ad Sanctum 22.  Barnes 1981 pp. 19 294.  a b Barnes 1981 p. 19.  Barnes 1982 p. 49 Carri  Rousselle 1999 pp. 163164.  Barnes 1981 p. 20 Inscriptiones Latinae Selectae 660.  Lactantius 
33.1 . Williams 1985 pp. 8384 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 20.  Barnes 1981 pp. 2021.  Lactantius 
10.6 11.  Barnes 1981 p. 21 Odahl 2004 p. 67.  Eusebius Life of Constantine 
2.5 0  Barnes 1981 p. 21 Odahl 2004 p. 67 Potter 2005 p. 338.  Barnes 1981 p. 22 Odahl 2004 pp. 6769 Potter 2005 p. 337 Southern 2001 p. 168.  Barnes 1981 p. 22 Williams 1985 p. 176 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Barnes 1981 p. 22 Liebeschuetz 1979 pp. 249250.  a b Barnes 1981 p. 24 Southern 2001 p. 168.  a b c Barnes 1981 pp. 2324.  Treadgold 1997 p. 25.  Southern 2001 p. 168.  Barnes 1981 p. 39.  Tilley 1996 p. xi.  Barnes 1981 pp. 4849 208213.  Barnes 1981 pp. 208213.  Lactantius Divinae Institutiones 
7.1 617 cf. Daniel 72325  Digeser 2000 pp. 149150.  Gibbon 1952 Vol. 1 pp. 153  712 note 92.  a b Potter 2005 p. 341.  Barnes 1981 pp. 2425.  Panegyrici Latini 76
15.1 6 Lactantius 
20.4  Southern 2001 pp. 152 336.  a b Barnes 1981 p. 25 Southern 2001 p. 152.  Lactantius 
18.1 7.  a b Nixon  Rodgers 2023 pp. 188190 Southern 2015 p. 237.  Barnes 1981 pp. 2527 Lenski 2006 p. 60 Odahl 2004 pp. 6972 Potter 2005 pp. 341342.  Barnes 1981 pp. 2526.  Lactantius 
19.2 6.  Barnes 1981 p. 26 Potter 2005 p. 342.  Lenski 2006 pp. 6061 Odahl 2004 pp. 7274 Southern 2001 pp. 152153.  Wilkes 1993 p. 13.  Wilkes 1993 pp. 1417.  Britannica 2015.  Barnes 1981 p. 27 Southern 2001 p. 152.  Barnes 1981 pp. 3132 Lenski 2006 p. 65 Odahl 2004 p. 90.  Epit. Caesaribus 
39.6 .  a b Nakamura Byron J. July 2003. When Did Diocletian Die New Evidence for an Old Problem. Classical Philology. 98 3 283289. doi
10.1 086420722. JSTOR 
10.1 086420722. S
2 CID 161249335. Archived from the original on 20 December 2022. Retrieved 20 December 2022.  Barnes 1981 p. 41.  Potter 2005 pp. 294295.  Potter 2005 p. 298.  Potter 2005 pp. 294298 quoting CIL 617 618  641.  Corcoran 2006 pp. 4445.  Corcoran 2006 p. 43 Potter 2005 p. 290.  CAH pp. 171172 Corcoran 2006 p. 43 Liebeschuetz 1979 pp. 235252.  Potter 2005 p. 290.  a b Southern 2001 pp. 162163.  Southern 2001 pp. 153154 163.  CAH pp. 171172 Southern 2001 pp. 162163 Williams 1985 p. 110 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  CAH p. 172 citing the Codex Justinianus 
9.4 
7.1 2.  Southern 2001 pp. 16263 Williams 1985 p. 110 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Williams 1985 pp. 107110. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  a b Lactantius 7.  a b c Treadgold 1997 p. 19.  Bagnall Roger S. 1993. Egypt in Late Antiquity. Princeton Princeton University Press. p. 66. ISBN 0691069867.  CAH p. 173 fn. 6.  Jones 1964 p. 1057.  a b Carri  Rousselle 1999 p. 678.  As taken from the Laterculus Veronensis or Verona List reproduced in Barnes 1982 chs. 1213 with corrections in Barnes Timothy D. 1996. Emperors panegyrics prefects provinces and palaces 284317. Journal of Roman Archaeology. 9 532552 at 548550. doi
10.1 0
17 S1047759400017037. S
2 CID 250350035.. See also Barnes 1981 p. 9 CAH p. 179 Rees 2004 pp. 2427.  Barnes 1981 p. 9 Rees 2004 pp. 2526.  a b c Barnes 1981 p. 10.  Carri  Rousselle 1999 pp. 655666.  Potter 2005 p. 296.  Harries 1999 pp. 5354 Potter 2005 p. 296.  Williams 1985 p. 107. There were still some governors  like Arpagius the 298 governor of Britannia Secunda  who still busied themselves with military affairs in strained circumstances. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Barnes 1981 pp. 910 Treadgold 1997 pp. 1820.  Rees 2004 p. 25 citing Corcoran Simon 1996. The Empire of the Tetrarchs Imperial Pronouncements and Government A.D. 284324. Oxford Clarendon Press. pp. 234253. ISBN 9780198149842.  Salzman Michele Renee 2009. The Making of a Christian Aristocracy Social and Religious Change in the Western Roman Empire. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. p. 31. ISBN 9780674006416.  Mennen Inge 2011. Power and Status in the Roman Empire AD 193284. Leiden Brill. p. 77. ISBN 9789004203594.  Cod. Justinianus 
2.1 
3.1 .  Leadbetter Bill 2009. Galerius and the Will of Diocletian. Oxford Routledge. ISBN 9780415404884 Veyne Paul 2005. LEmpire GrcoRomain. Paris Seuil. p. 64 fn. 208. ISBN 2020577984.  Connolly Serena 2010. Lives behind the Laws The World of the Codex Hermogenianus. Bloomington Indiana University Press. p. 61. ISBN 9780253354013.  Radner Karen ed. 2014. State Correspondence in the Ancient World From New Kingdom Egypt to the Roman Empire. Oxford Oxford University Press. p. 181. ISBN 9780199354771.  Williams 1985 pp. 5354 142143. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  CAH p. 201 Williams 1985 p. 143 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Potter 2005 pp. 296 652.  Harries 1999 pp. 1415 Potter 2005 pp. 295296.  Potter 2005 pp. 295296.  Harries 1999 pp. 21 2930 Potter 2005 pp. 295296.  Harries 1999 pp. 2122.  Harries 1999 pp. 6364.  Mousourakis George 2012. Fundamentals of Roman Private Law. Berlin Springer. p. 64. ISBN 9783642293108.  Harries 1999 p. 162.  Harries 1999 p. 167.  Harries 1999 p. 55.  CAH p. 207.  Lim Richard 2010. Late Antiquity. The Edinburgh Companion to Ancient Greece and Rome. Edinburgh Edinburgh University Press. p. 115.  a b Christol  Nony 2003 p. 241.  Carri  Rousselle 1999 p. 166.  a b Luttwak Edward 1979. The Grand Strategy of the Roman Empire. Baltimore Johns Hopkins University Press. p. 176. ISBN 0801821584.  CAH pp. 124126 Southern 2001 pp. 154155 Rees 2004 p. 1920 Williams 1985 pp. 91101 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  CAH p. 171 Rees 2004 p. 27.  Rees 2004 p. 27.  Corcoran 2006 p. 46 quoting Zosimus 
2.3 4.  Southern 2001 p. 157.  De Mensibus Archived 4 March 2023 at the Wayback Machine 
1.2 7.  Rees 2004 p. 17.  Southern 2001 pp. 158159 Treadgold 1997 pp. 112113.  a b c Treadgold 1997 p. 20.  Southern 2001 p. 159.  CAH p. 173 Rees 2004 p. 18.  a b Southern 2001 p. 160 Treadgold 1997 p. 20.  Potter 2005 p. 333.  Barnes 1981 pp. 9 288 Rees 2004 pp. 2829 Southern 2001 p. 159.  Carri  Rousselle 1999 pp. 187188.  Williams 1985 p. 125. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Brown 1989 p. 25.  a b c d Southern 2001 p. 160.  a b Potter 2005 p. 392.  Potter 2005 pp. 392393.  a b c CAH pp. 176177.  Potter 2005 pp. 334 393 Southern 2001 p. 160.  a b c Potter 2005 pp. 334336.  Potter 2005 p. 393.  Southern 2001 p. 339.  CAH pp. 177178 Potter 2005 p. 335 Southern 2001 p. 161.  Potter 2005 p. 335.  Rees 2004 pp. 42 44.  CAH pp. 178.  Potter 2005 p. 336 Southern 2001 p. 161.  Lactantius 
7.6 7 CAH p. 178 Southern 2001 p. 161.  Potter 2005 p. 336 Williams 1985 pp. 131132 sfnm error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help.  Jones 1964 p. 40.  Williams 1985 pp. 228229. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Williams 1985 pp. 196198. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Williams 1985 pp. 204206. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Williams 1985 pp. 207208 218219. sfn error no target CITEREFWilliams1985 help  Blackburn Bonnie HolfordStrevens Leofranc 2003. The Oxford Companion to the Year Reprint with corrections ed.. Oxford Oxford University Press. p. 767. ISBN 9780192142313. OCLC 723603113.  Jankovi ore in Serbian 6 September 2007.   e   About the name of Diokleja before Nemanji. Project Rastko. Archived from the original on 3 March 2016. Retrieved 16 August 2008.  Kulii piro Petrovi P. . Panteli N. 1970.    Serbian Mythological Dictionary PDF in Serbian. Belgrade  sr. p. 122. Archived PDF from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 28 January 2023.  Genesis Rabbah 84 in Hebrew. Sefaria. Archived from the original on 25 February 2023. Retrieved 24 January 2023.  The Legends of King Diocletian in Hebrew. Tel Aviv Rabbi Meir Baal Hanes Synagogue. Archived from the original on 14 October 2021. Retrieved 24 January 2023. Bibliographyedit Ancient sourcesedit Lactantius c. 316 De mortibus persecutorum 1 Eusebius 325 Church History Book 8. Eutropius c. 370 Breviarium Book 9 XII Panegyrici Latini Twelve Latin Panegyrics relevant panegyrics dated 289 291 297 298 and 307. Aurelius Victor att. 
5 th century Epitome de Caesaribus translation Historia Augusta 
5 th century translation Archived 25 July 2021 at the Wayback Machine Justinian I 534 Codex Justinianus translation Joannes Zonaras c. 1140 Epitome of History  . Compendium extract Diocletian to the Death of Galerius 284311 Modern sourcesedit Banchich Thomas M. 1997. Iulianus ca. 286293 A.D.. De Imperatoribus Romanis. Archived from the original on 26 March 2022. Barnes Timothy D. 1975. Two Senators under Constantine. The Journal of Roman Studies. 65 4049. doi
10.2 307370062. JSTOR 370062. S
2 CID 163755638. Barnes Timothy D. 1981. Constantine and Eusebius. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. ISBN 9780674165311. Barnes Timothy D. 1982. The New Empire of Diocletian and Constantine. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. doi
10.4 1
59 harvard.9780674280670. ISBN 0674280660. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 9 January 2022. Bleckmann Bruno 2006. Diocletianus. New Pauly Online. Brill. ISBN 9004122591. Archived from the original on 20 December 2022. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Bowman Alan ed. 2005. The Cambridge Ancient History XII The Crisis of the Empire. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9780521302005. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Brown Peter 1989. The World of Late Antiquity AD 150750. New York and London W.W. Norton and Co. ISBN 9780393958034. Burgess Richard W. 2023. Cutting the Herculian Knot When Did Maximian Become Caesar and Augustus. In Schuler Haensch Killen eds.. Chiron 53 Mitteilungen der Kommission fr Alte Geschichte und Epigraphik des Deutschen Archologischen Instituts. Walter de Gruyter GmbH  Co KG. pp. 139. doi
10.3 4780
74 h
5 hc
1 b. ISBN 9783111252490. Burgess R.W. 1996. The Date of the Persecution of Christians in the Army. Journal of Theological Studies. 47 1 157158. doi
10.1 0
93 jts

47.1.1 57. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Carri JeanMichel Rousselle Aline 1999. LEmpire Romain en mutation des Svres  Constantin 192337. Paris ditions du Seuil. p. 228. ISBN 2020258196. Christol Michel Nony D. 2003. Rome et son Empire. Paris Hachette. ISBN 2020258196. Corcoran Simon 2006. Before Constantine. In Lenski Noel Emmanuel ed.. The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Constantine. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. pp. 3558. ISBN 0521521572. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Delbrck Richard 2007 1932. Antike Porphyrwerke Ancient Porphyry Works in German. Berlin reprinted Rome De Gruyter reprinted LErma di Bretschneider. ISBN 9788882654542. OCLC 191032377. Digeser Elizabeth DePalma 2000. The Making of A Christian Empire Lactantius and Rome. London Cornell University Press. ISBN 0801435943. DiMaio Michael 1997. L. Domitius Domitianus and Aurelius Achilleus ca.2962
97 ca.297298. De Imperatoribus Romanis. Archived from the original on 26 March 2022. Elsner Ja 1998. Imperial Rome and Christian Triumph. Oxford Oxford University Press. ISBN 0192842013. Gibbon Edward 1952 1789. Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Chicago Encyclopdia Britannica Inc. 2 volumes. Harries Jill 1999. Law and Empire in Late Antiquity. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521410878. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 17 February 2023. Helgeland John 1974. Christians and the Roman Army A.D. 173337. Church History. 43 2 149163. doi
10.2 3073163949. JSTOR 3163949. S
2 CID 162376477. Jones A.H.M. 1964. The Later Roman Empire 284602. Oxford Blackwell. OCLC 792013. Jones A.H.M. J.R. Martindale  J. Morris 1971. C. Aur. Val. Diocletianus 2. Prosopography of the Later Roman Empire. Vol. 1. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. pp. 253254. ISBN 0521072336. Kuhoff Wolfgang 2001. Diokletian und die Epoche der Tetrarchie. Das rmische Reich zwischen Krisenbewltigung und Neuaufbau 284313 n. Chr.. Frankfurt am Main Peter Lang. ISBN 3631367929. Lenski Noel Emmanuel 2006. Reign of Constantine. The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Constantine. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. pp. 5961. ISBN 0521521572. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Leadbetter William 20
01 a. Numerianus 283284 A.D.. De Imperatoribus Romanis. Archived from the original on 26 March 2022. Leadbetter William 20
01 b. Carinus 283285 A.D.. De Imperatoribus Romanis. Archived from the original on 26 March 2022. Liebeschuetz J. H. W. G. 1979. Continuity and Change in Roman Religion. Oxford Oxford University Press. p. 247. ISBN 0198148224. Mathisen Ralph W. 1997. Diocletian 284305 A.D.. De Imperatoribus Romanis. Archived from the original on 26 March 2022. Millar Fergus 1993. The Roman Near East 31 B.C.A.D. 337. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. ISBN 9780674778863. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Nixon C. E. V. Rodgers Barbara Saylor 2023. In Praise of Later Roman Emperors The Panegyrici Latini. Univ of California Press. ISBN 9780520342828. Odahl Charles Matson 2004. Constantine and the Christian Empire. New York Routledge. ISBN 9781134686315. Archived from the original on 20 December 2022. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Potter David S. 2005. The Roman Empire at Bay AD 180395. New York Routledge. ISBN 0415100577. Archived from the original on 19 March 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Rees Roger 2004. Diocletian and the Tetrarchy. Edinburgh Edinburgh University Press. ISBN 0748616616. JSTOR 
10.3 3
66 j.ctvxcrmzd. Archived from the original on 20 December 2022. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Southern Patricia 2001. The Roman Empire from Severus to Constantine. New York Routledge. ISBN 0415239443. Southern Patricia 2015. The Roman Empire from Severus to Constantine 
2 nd ed.. Routledge. ISBN 9781317496946. Tilley Maureen A ed. 1996. Donatist Martyr Stories The Church in Conflict in Roman North Africa. Liverpool Liverpool University Press. ISBN 0853239312.. Treadgold Warren 1997. A History of the Byzantine State and Society. Stanford Stanford University Press. ISBN 9780804726306. Archived from the original on 22 January 2023. Retrieved 20 December 2022. Wilkes J. J. 1993. Diocletians Palace Split Residence of a Retired Roman Emperor. Oxford Ian Sanders Memorial Committee. ISBN 9780952107309. Williams Stephen 1997. Diocletian and the Roman Recovery. Psychology Press. ISBN 9780415918275. Palace of Diocletian  building Split Croatia. Encyclopdia Britannica. Chicago Encyclopdia Britannica Inc. 20 August 2015. Archived from the original on 13 March 2023. Retrieved 13 March 2023. External linksedit Diocletian from the Catholic Encyclopedia. Ruins of the Palace of the Emperor Diocletian at Spalatro in Dalmatia By Robert Adam 1764. Plates made available by the University of Wisconsin Digital Collections Center. N.B. Spalatro was a less used alternative form of Spalato the Italian name for Croatian Split. v t e Simplified family tree of Tetrarchs See also Chronological scheme of the Tetrarchy 286324 DIOCLETIAN Iovius Western Emperor 286305 Prisca Afranius Hannibalianus disputedM 1 consul 292 Eutropia Maximian Herculius Western Emperor 286305 Unknown sister Galerius Eastern Emperor 305311 Galeria Valeria Helena Constantius I Western Emperor 305306 Constantinian Dynasty Flavia Maximiana Theodora Severus II Western Emperor 306307 Maximinus II Eastern Emperor 310313 Valeria Maximilla Maxentius Western Emperor 306312 Fausta Constantine I Roman Emperor 306337 Julius Constantius consul 335 Flavia Julia Constantia Licinius I Eastern Emperor 308324 Martinian Western Emperor 324 Valens I Western Emperor 316317 Valerius Romulus Constantine II Emperor 337340 Constantius II Emperor 337361 Constans I Emperor 337350 Julian II Emperor 361363 Licinius II caesar Notes  Timothy Barnes New Empire 3334 questions the parentage of Theodora shown here. He proposes that Maximian is her natural father and that her mother is possibly a daughter of Afranius Hannibalianus. Substituting Afranicus Hannibalianus and switching the positions of Maximian and Eutropia would produce a diagram that matches the alternative lineage. Bibliography Barnes Timothy D. The New Empire of Diocletian and Constantine. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press 1982. ISBN 0783722214 Titles and succession Regnal titles Preceded by Numerian and Carinus Roman emperor 284305 Served alongside Maximian Succeeded by Constantius I and Galerius Political offices Preceded by Carinus Numerian Roman consul 284285 with Lucius Caesonius Bassus  Titus Claudius Aurelius Aristobulus Succeeded by Marcus Junius Maximus Vettius Aquilinus Preceded by Marcus Junius Maximus Vettius Aquilinus Roman consul 287 with Maximian Succeeded by Maximian Pomponius Ianuarianus Preceded by Marcus Magrius Bassus Lucius Ragonius Quintianus Roman consul 290 with Maximian Succeeded by Gaius Junius Tiberianus Cassius Dio Preceded by Afranius Hannibalianus Julius Asclepiodotus Roman consul 293 with Maximian Succeeded by Constantius I Galerius Preceded by Nummius Tuscus Gaius Annius Anullinus Roman consul 296 with Constantius I Succeeded by Maximian Galerius Preceded by Anicius Faustus Virius Gallus Roman consul 299 with Maximian Succeeded by Constantius I Galerius Preceded by Constantius I Galerius Roman consul 303304 with Maximian Succeeded by Constantius I Galerius Preceded by Maximian Constantine I Severus II Maximinus II Galerius Roman consul 308 with Galerius Maxentius Valerius Romulus Succeeded by Licinius I Constantine I Maxentius Valerius Romulus v t e Roman and Byzantine emperors and empresses regnant Principate 27 BC  AD 235 Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Marcus Aurelius Lucius Verus Commodus Pertinax Didius Julianus Septimius Severus Caracalla Geta Macrinus w. Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Crisis 235285 Maximinus I Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip I w. Philip II Decius w. Herennius Etruscus Trebonianus Gallus w. Hostilian  Volusianus Aemilianus Silbannacus  Valerian Gallienus w. Saloninus Claudius II Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Florianus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Dominate 284610 Diocletian Maximian Galerius Constantius I Severus II Constantine I Maxentius Licinius Maximinus II Valerius Valens Martinian Constantine II Constantius II Constans I Magnentius Nepotianus Vetranio Julian Jovian Valentinian I Valens Procopius Gratian Theodosius I Valentinian II Magnus Maximus w. Victor Eugenius Western Empire 395480 Honorius Constantine III w. Constans II Priscus Attalus Constantius III Joannes Valentinian III Petronius Maximus Avitus Majorian Severus III Anthemius Olybrius Glycerius Julius Nepos Romulus Augustulus Eastern Empire 395610 Arcadius Theodosius II Marcian Leo I Leo II Zeno Basiliscus w. Marcus Anastasius I Justin I Justinian I Justin II Tiberius II Constantine Maurice w. Theodosius Phocas Eastern Byzantine Empire 6101453 Heraclius Constantine III Heraclonas w. Tiberius Constans II Constantine IV w. Heraclius  Tiberius Justinian II Leontius Tiberius III Justinian II w. Tiberius Philippicus Anastasius II Theodosius III Leo III Constantine V Artabasdos w. Nikephoros Leo IV Constantine VI Irene Nikephoros I Staurakios Michael I Rangabe w. Theophylact  Staurakios Leo V w. Constantine Michael II Theophilos w. Constantine Theodora II w. Thekla Michael III Basil I w. Constantine Leo VI Alexander Constantine VII Romanos I Lekapenos w. Christopher Stephen  Constantine Lekapenos Romanos II Nikephoros II Phokas John I Tzimiskes Basil II Constantine VIII Zoe Romanos III Argyros Michael IV Michael V Constantine IX Monomachos Theodora III Michael VI Bringas Isaac I Komnenos Constantine X Doukas Eudokia Makrembolitissa Romanos IV Diogenes w. Leo  Nikephoros Michael VII Doukas w. Andronikos Konstantios  Constantine Doukas Nikephoros III Botaneiates Alexios I Komnenos w. Constantine Doukas John II Komnenos w. Alexios Manuel I Komnenos Alexios II Komnenos Andronikos I Komnenos w. John Isaac II Angelos Alexios III Angelos Alexios IV Angelos Alexios V Doukas Theodore I Laskaris w. Nicholas John III Vatatzes Theodore II Laskaris John IV Laskaris Michael VIII Palaiologos Andronikos II Palaiologos Michael IX Palaiologos Andronikos III Palaiologos John V Palaiologos John VI Kantakouzenos w. Matthew Andronikos IV Palaiologos John VII Palaiologos w. Andronikos V Manuel II Palaiologos John VIII Palaiologos Constantine XI Palaiologos See also Gallic emperors 260274 Palmyrene emperors 267273 Britannic emperors 286296 Trapezuntine emperors 12041461 Thessalonian emperors 12241242 Empresses Augustae Usurpers Classical Eastern Italics indicates a junior coemperor underlining indicates an emperor variously regarded as either legitimate or a usurper v t e Pharaohs Protodynastic to First Intermediate Period 31502040 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Protodynastic pre3150 BC Lower Hedju Hor NyHor NiNeith HatHor Pu Hsekiu Khayu Tiu Thesh Neheb Wazner Mekh A Double Falcon Wash Upper A Finger Snail Fish PenAbu Stork Bull Scorpion I Shendjw IryHor Ka Scorpion II Narmer  Menes Early Dynastic 31502686 BC I Narmer  Menes HorAha Djer Djet Den Anedjib Semerkhet Qaa Sneferka Horus Bird II Hotepsekhemwy Nebra Nynetjer Ba Nubnefer Horus Sa WenegNebty Wadjenes Senedj SethPeribsen SekhemibPerenmaat Neferkara I Neferkasokar Hudjefa I Khasekhemwy Old Kingdom 26862181 BC III Djoser Sekhemkhet Sanakht Nebka Khaba Sedjes Qahedjet Huni IV Snefru Khufu Djedefre Khafre Bikheris Menkaure Shepseskaf Thamphthis V Userkaf Sahure Neferirkare Kakai Neferefre Shepseskare Nyuserre Ini Menkauhor Kaiu Djedkare Isesi Unas VI Teti Userkare Pepi I Merenre Nemtyemsaf I Pepi II Merenre Nemtyemsaf II Netjerkare Siptah Neferka Nefer 
1 st Intermediate 21812040 BC VIIVIII Menkare Neferkare II Neferkare III Neby Djedkare Shemai Neferkare IV Khendu Merenhor Neferkamin Nikare Neferkare V Tereru Neferkahor Neferkare VI Pepiseneb Neferkamin Anu Qakare Iby Neferkaure Neferkauhor Neferirkare Wadjkare Khuiqer Khui Iytjenu IX Meryibre Khety Neferkare VII Nebkaure Khety Setut Imhotep X Meryhathor Neferkare VIII Wahkare Khety Merykare Middle Kingdom and Second Intermediate Period 20401550 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Middle Kingdom 20401802 BC XI Mentuhotep I Intef I Intef II Intef III Mentuhotep II Mentuhotep III Mentuhotep IV Nubia Segerseni Qakare Ini Iyibkhentre XII Amenemhat I Senusret I Amenemhat II Senusret II Senusret III Amenemhat III Amenemhat IV Sobekneferu Seankhibtawy Seankhibra 
2 nd Intermediate 18021550 BC XIII Sekhemrekhutawy Sobekhotep Sonbef Nerikare Sekhemkare Amenemhat V Ameny Qemau Hotepibre Iufni Ameny Antef Amenemhet VI Semenkare Nebnuni Sehetepibre Sewadjkare Nedjemibre Khaankhre Sobekhotep Renseneb Hor Sekhemrekhutawy Khabaw Djedkheperew Sebkay Sedjefakare Wegaf Khendjer Imyremeshaw Sehetepkare Intef Seth Meribre Sobekhotep III Neferhotep I Sihathor Sobekhotep IV Merhotepre Sobekhotep Khahotepre Sobekhotep Wahibre Ibiau Merneferre Ay Merhotepre Ini Sankhenre Sewadjtu Mersekhemre Ined Sewadjkare Hori Merkawre Sobekhotep Mershepsesre Ini II Sewahenre Senebmiu Merkheperre Merkare Sewadjare Mentuhotep Seheqenre Sankhptahi XIV Yakbim Sekhaenre Yaammu Nubwoserre Qareh Khawoserre Ammu Ahotepre Maaibre Sheshi Nehesy Khakherewre Nebefawre Sehebre Merdjefare Sewadjkare III Nebdjefare Nebsenre Sekheperenre Bebnum Apepi Nuya Wazad Sheneh Shenshek Khamure Yakareb YaqubHar XV Sharek Semqen AperAnati Salitis SakirHar Khyan Yanassi Apepi Khamudi XVI Djehuti Sobekhotep VIII Neferhotep III Mentuhotepi Nebiryraw I Nebiriau II Semenre Bebiankh Sekhemre Shedwast Dedumose I Dedumose II Montuemsaf Merankhre Mentuhotep Senusret IV Pepi III Abydos Senebkay Wepwawetemsaf Pantjeny Snaaib XVII Rahotep Nebmaatre Sobekemsaf I Sobekemsaf II SekhemreWepmaat Intef Nubkheperre Intef SekhemreHeruhirmaat Intef Senakhtenre Ahmose Seqenenre Tao Kamose New Kingdom and Third Intermediate Period 1550664 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain New Kingdom 15501070 BC XVIII Ahmose I Amenhotep I Thutmose I Thutmose II Hatshepsut Thutmose III Amenhotep II Thutmose IV Amenhotep III Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb XIX Ramesses I Seti I Ramesses II Merneptah Amenmesses Seti II Siptah Twosret XX Setnakhte Ramesses III Ramesses IV Ramesses V Ramesses VI Ramesses VII Ramesses VIII Ramesses IX Ramesses X Ramesses XI 
3 rd Intermediate 1069664 BC XXI Smendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II High Priests of Amun Herihor Piankh Pinedjem I Masaharta Djedkhonsuefankh Menkheperre Smendes II Pinedjem II Psusennes III XXII Shoshenq I Osorkon I Shoshenq II Tutkheperre Shoshenq Takelot I Osorkon II Shoshenq III Shoshenq IV Pami Shoshenq V Pedubast II Osorkon IV XXIII Harsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Iuput I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Shoshenq VII Menkheperre Ini XXIV Tefnakht Bakenranef XXV Piye Shebitku Shabaka Taharqa Tanutamun Late Period and Hellenistic Period 66430 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Late 664332 BC XXVI Ammeris Tefnakht II Nekauba Necho I Psamtik I Necho II Psamtik II Wahibre Ahmose II Psamtik III XXVII Cambyses II Petubastis III Darius I Psammetichus IV Xerxes Artaxerxes I Darius II XXVIII Amyrtaeus XXIX Nepherites I Hakor Psammuthes Nepherites II Muthis XXX Nectanebo I Teos Nectanebo II XXXI Artaxerxes III Khabash Arses Darius III Hellenistic 33230 BC Argead Alexander the Great Philip III Arrhidaeus Alexander IV Ptolemaic Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy II Philadelphus Arsinoe II Ptolemy III Euergetes Berenice II Euergetes Ptolemy IV Philopator Arsinoe III Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra Ptolemy VI Philometor Cleopatra II Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Ptolemy VIII Euergetes Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Soter Cleopatra IV Ptolemy X Alexander I Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander II Ptolemy XII Neos Dionysos Cleopatra V Berenice IV Epiphaneia Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator Arsinoe IV Ptolemy XIV Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Roman Period 30 BC313 AD Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Roman 30 BC313 AD XXXIV Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Lucius Verus Marcus Aurelius Commodus Pertinax Pescennius Niger Septimius Severus Geta Caracalla Macrinus Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Maximinus Thrax Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip Decius Trebonianus Gallus Aemilianus Valerian Macrianus Minor Quietus Lucius Mussius Aemilianus Gallienus Claudius Gothicus Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Diocletian Maximian Galerius Maximinus Daza Dynastic genealogies 
1 st 
2 nd 
3 rd 
4 th 
11 th 
12 th 
18 th 
19 th 
20 th 
21 st to 
23 rd 
24 th 
25 th 
26 th 
27 th 
30 th 
31 st Argead Ptolemaic List of pharaohs Portals Ancient Rome Biography History Italy Diocletian at Wikipedias sister projects Media from Commons Quotations from Wikiquote Texts from Wikisource Data from Wikidata Authority control databases International FAST ISNI VIAF 2 3 4 5 6 7 National Norway France BnF data Catalonia Germany Italy Israel Finland United States Sweden Latvia Japan Czech Republic Greece Netherlands Poland Vatican Artists Te Papa New Zealand ULAN People Deutsche Biographie Other IdRef Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleDiocletianoldid1222888308 Categories Diocletian 
3 rdcentury Roman emperors 
4 thcentury Roman emperors 2
40 s births 311 deaths Crisis of the Third Century Deified Roman emperors Imperial Roman consuls Monarchs who abdicated People from Roman Dalmatia Burials in Croatia History of Split Croatia Aurelii Valerii Tetrarchy People of the RomanSasanian Wars Imperial Roman slaves and freedmen Roman pharaohs Illyrian emperors Hidden categories Articles containing Latinlanguage text Harv and Sfn notarget errors Webarchive template wayback links CS1 uses Serbianlanguage script sr CS1 Serbianlanguage sources sr CS1 Hebrewlanguage sources he Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Featured articles Use dmy dates from January 2023 Articles containing Ancient Greek to 14
53 language text CS1 Germanlanguage sources de Pages using Sister project links with hidden wikidata Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with BIBSYS identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with CANTICN identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with ICCU identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with KANTO identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with Libris identifiers Articles with LNB identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NLG identifiers Articles with NTA identifiers Articles with PLWABN identifiers Articles with VcBA identifiers Articles with TePapa identifiers Articles with ULAN identifiers Articles with DTBIO identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers This page was last edited on 8 May 2024 at 1516 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width